 We now have mice that are 4 months old and had diabetes and now don't have it anymore.
 Dr Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and chair of the Canadian Diabetes Association's clinical and scientific research division,
 Like some other experts, he was skeptical about the possibility of curing diabetes, and pointed out that the findings were of no relevance to people who were already suffering from type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy, announced on Sveriges Radio in Sweden that the Academy had given up its efforts to inform Bob Dylan of his award,
 Danius said, I've called his closest aide and sent him Emails and gotten very friendly replies.
 Rings Ceo Jamie Siminoff once said he founded the company after he couldn't hear his doorbell from his garage workshop.
 He said he had built a WLAN doorbell.
 Siminoff said sales had soared after his appearance on a 2013 episode of Shark Tank, although the show's panel had rejected financing his start-up.
 In late 2017, Siminoff appeared on the Teleshopping channel, QVC.
 Ring has also settled a lawsuit with the competing security firm ADT Corporation.
 While an experimental vaccine seems to be able to reduce Ebola mortality, there are no drugs currently available that have been proven to be clearly effective in treating existing infections.
 An antibody cocktail, ZMapp, initially looked promising, but formal studies showed that it had less of a benefit in preventing deaths than had been hoped.
 In the PALM study, ZMapp served as a control, meaning the scientists used it as a baseline and compared the three other treatments to it.
 USA Gymnastics supports the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and accepts it as an absolute necessity for the Olympic family to set a safe and healthy environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC statement that it is in the best interest of our athletes, our clubs and our sport to make meaningful changes within our organization,
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could bring to light how abuse of the magnitude so bravely described by the survivors of Larry Nassar could have gone unchecked for so long and welcomes any and all necessary and appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC have the same goal of making gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible for the athletes so they can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and empowered environment.
 During the nineteen sixty s, Brzezinski worked as an advisor to John F . Kennedy and then to the administration of Lyndon B . Johnson.
 During the 1976 elections, he advised Carter on foreign policy and then served from 1977 to 1981 as national security advisor.
 As national security advisor, he supported Carter's diplomatic handling of world affairs, such as the Camp David Accords of 1978, the normalization of U.S. relations with China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution, which led to the Iran hostage crisis, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone has received nominations in all of the main categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for best actor and best actress, respectively.
 Further nominations are for best film, direction, cinematography, costume design, editing, original score, production design, sound editing, sound mixing and original screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition and City of Stars, were nominated for best original song.
 On the late Sunday, the President of the United States, Donald Trump, announced in a statement read by the press Secretary that the U S . troops would leave Syria.
 The announcement came after a telephone call from Trump to the Turkish President, Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would carry out the monitoring of captured ISIS fighters, whose return, it said in the statement, had been rejected by European countries.
 This confirms not only that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory that's already widely accepted, but also provides details that fossils generally can't.
 Scientists say that the bird's plumage was chestnut-brown on the upper surface and light or carotinoid on the underside.
 The find also gives insights into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Because the dinosaur feathers lacked a well-developed shaft, the rachis, but had other features of feathers,
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but rather for temperature regulation or for display.
 The researchers claimed that although this is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample shows the feathers of an adult and does not show any juvenile Daunen.
 A car bomb detonated this morning at the Turkish police headquarters in Gaziantep, killing two police officers and wounding over twenty other people.
 According to the governor's office, nineteen of the injured were police officers.
 The police said they suspected a militant supporter of Daesh, or ISIL, behind the attack.
 They have found out that the sun operates on the same basic principles as other stars: it has been found that the activity of all the stars in the system is driven by their luminosity, rotation and nothing else.
 To determine the Rossby number of a star, which is related to the plasma stream, the luminosity and the rotation are both included.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the Star is in terms of Umpoling the magnetic field.
 During the voyage, Iwasaki encountered many difficulties.
 He was robbed by Pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped a forced marriage in Nepal, and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard runs on the 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz frequencies.
 This allows it to be backwards compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g, provided the base station has dual-radio.
 The speed of 802.11n is significantly faster than that of its predecessors, which had a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duvall, who is married and has two grown children, did not make a big impression on Miller, who told the story.
 As he was asked for a comment, Miller said, quote,
 We will strive to reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by 2020 to a level significantly lower than that of 2005.
 He did not give a figure for the cuts, but said they would be made on the basis of China's economic performance.
 Hu encouraged developing countries to avoid the old path of first polluting and then cleaning up.
 He added, however, that they should not be asked to make commitments beyond their development, their responsibility and their capabilities.
 The Iraq study group released its report today at 12:00 GMT.
 He warns that no one can guarantee that any course of action in Iraq at this point will stop sectarian warfare, the growing violence or a slide into chaos.
 The report starts with a call for an open debate and for consensus building in the USA on a strategy for the Middle East.
 The report is almost universally critical of the current policy of the executive in relation to Iraq and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 The first of the 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be taken before the end of this year to secure Iraq's borders against hostile intervention and to reestablish diplomatic relations with its neighbors.
 The current Argentine Senator and First Lady, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her candidacy last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometres from Buenos Aires.
 In 2005, Kirchner began her campaign for the Argentine Senate as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 The trigger for the debate was a controversy over spending for the relief and reconstruction after Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscally conservative humorists have dubbed the Bush New Orleans deal.
 The criticism of the Liberals on the reconstruction process has focused on the fact that reconstruction contracts were given to alleged insiders in Washington.
 More than four million people came to Rome to attend the funeral.
 The number of people wanting to attend the funeral was so great that not everyone could get in.
 Several large television screens were set up at various locations in Rome so that people could watch the ceremony.
 In many other cities in Italy and the rest of the world, especially in Poland, similar installations were set up and seen by many people.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's policy from earlier times, saying that it concentrated its resources on cases that were easy to solve,
 The Congress began in August 2005 with the financing of the anti-obscenity initiative and set the FBI to deploy 10 agents for the adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest individual score of the innings, 70 runs from only 41 balls, by hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The middle order batsmen, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, showed good form and scored a partnership with 100 runs.
 After the loss of the captain's wicket, India scored only 36 runs and lost 7 wickets, thereby ending the innings.
 The U S . President, George W . Bush, arrived in Singapore on the morning of November sixteen and began a one-week tour of Asia.
 He was greeted by Wong Kan Seng, the deputy Prime Minister of Singapore, and spoke with Lee Hsien Loong, the Prime Minister of Singapore, about trade and terrorism.
 After a week of losses in the midterm election, Bush told the crowd about expanding trade in Asia.
 Premier Stephen Harper agreed after a 25-minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton on Tuesday to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee of all parties for review before the second hearing.
 Layton had during the meeting with the Premier made changes to the Conservative's environmental law and had demanded a thorough and complete rewrite of the Conservative's environmental law.
 After the Commonwealth Government intervened to take over the funding of the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the state government and some state parliamentarians have criticised the move as a PR stunt ahead of the November Federal election.
 But Premier John Howard said the move to provide 45 million Australian dollars was only to prevent the Tasmanian government from downgrading the hospitals.
 According to the current bulletin, the measurements of the sea level indicated that a tsunami had been triggered,
 No major damage or injuries were reported from Tonga, although power outages were reported.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii that are on or near the coast were closed all day Wednesday, although the warnings had been lifted.
 U S . President George W . Bush welcomed the announcement.
 Bush spokesman Gordon Johndroe called the North Korean pledge a "major step in the direction of verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.
 The tenth storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, which received a name, subtropical storm Jerry, is today in the Atlantic ocean.
 At this time, the National Hurricane Center says that Jerry is no longer a threat to land.
 The American Corps of Engineers estimated that 6 inches of rain could cause the already damaged dams to break.
 The Ninth Ward, which was flooded up to 20 feet during Hurricane Katrina, is currently experiencing up to chest-high water as the nearby levee has been breached.
 On a 100-foot long section, water runs over the dam.
 The Commons-Administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his disappointment at the distances when he spoke to Wikinews last month.
 ""He's basically lied to us from the beginning, firstly, in that he pretended it was a legal matter,
 The Irritations in the community led to the current efforts to draft a guideline regarding sexually explicit content for the Website, which hosts millions of openly licensed media.
 The work was mostly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate observations that were made from the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect, after which the team looked, would be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter of the Galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky way.
 Just as the moon draws the earth and causes the tides, the Milky way also exerts a gravitational pull on the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The scientists concluded that the dark matter acts on other dark matter in the same way that normal matter acts on normal matter.
 This theory states that the majority of dark matter is in a kind of halo around a Galaxy and consists of many small particles.
 Television reports show white smoke coming from the plant.
 The local authorities are urging residents within the vicinity of the plant to stay indoors, to turn off their air conditioning units,
 According to Japan's nuclear watchdog, radioactive caesium and iodine were found at the plant.
 The authorities speculate that this indicates containers with uranium power could have been torn open at the site and are possibly leaking.
 The extremely drug-resistant tuberculosis, or XDR-TB, was discovered by Dr . Tony Moll in the South African region of KwaZulu-Natal.
 In an interview, he said the new variant is, quote,
 Some patients may have been infected in the hospital, says Dr Moll, and at least two were medical staff.
 Within a year, an infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 Despite this, the proportion of XDR-TB in the total group of people with tuberculosis is still apparently low, 6,000 of the total 330,000 people who are infected at any one time in South Africa.
 The two satellites, which weighed more than 1,000 pounds, collided 491 miles above the earth at an approximate speed of 17,500 miles per hour.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was massive.
 They are still trying to figure out how extensive the collision was and how it will affect the earth.
 The strategic command of the United States Department of defense is looking for the wreckage.
 The results of the plotting analysis are published on a public Website.
 A doctor at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, is charged with murder after her dead mother was found in the trunk of her car Wednesday in Ohio, authorities say.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found lying on the ground beside the road in T-shirt and underwear,
 She led the officers to her black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was parked 500 feet away.
 There, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, under blood-soaked sheets.
 The police said the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease this season were reported in late July.
 The disease is transmitted by pigs and then travels through mosquitoes to humans.
 The outbreak of the disease led the Indian government to employ pig catchers in heavily affected areas, to distribute thousands of mosquito nets and to spray pesticides.
 The government has also promised several million vials of vaccine against meningitis, which will help to ward off the health authorities for the next year.
 Plans for vaccines, which were to be delivered to the historically hardest hit areas, were delayed due to lack of funds and low priority setting compared to other diseases.
 In 1956, Słonia went to Sweden, where he started working in the Swedish post office,
 He produced over 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 The quality and precision of his work are so highly regarded that his name is one of the very few generally known names in the field of philately.
 His one thousandth stamp, from the year 2000, shows the splendid painting of the Royal Swedish Kings' famous deeds by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, and is recorded in the Guinness Book of Records.
 He was also involved in the design of many other currencies, including the Premier of Canada's portrait on the front of the Canadian 5 and 100 dollar bills.
 After the accident, Gibson was rushed to a hospital, where he died shortly after.
 The truck driver, who is 64 years old, was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident at around 12:00 GMT on the same day.
 A person who worked in a workshop near the scene of the accident said,
 They all ran back to the scene of the accident.
 Other topics on the agenda in Bali are the rescue of the world's remaining forests and the joint use of technologies that are supposed to help developing countries grow in a less environmentally damaging way.
 The United Nations hopes to set up a fund that will help the countries affected by global warming to cope with the effects.
 The money could be used for flood-resistant houses, better water management and crop diversification.
 Fluke wrote that the efforts of some, women who wanted to speak about women's health,
 She came to this conclusion based on the numerous positive comments and encouragement she received from both men and women who urged that contraceptives be seen as a medical necessity.
 As the fighting stopped after the transport of the wounded to the hospital, about 40 of the remaining inmates stayed on the yard and refused to return to their cells.
 The negotiators tried to defuse the situation, but the demands of the inmates are unclear.
 Between 22:00 and 11:00 a.m. MDT, a fire was started by the inmates in the yard.
 Soon, police officers wearing protective gear entered the compound and pushed the inmates with tear gas into a corner.
 The firefighters were able to put out the fire at 23:35.
 Since the dam was built in 1963, the seasonal flooding that distributed sediments in the river has come to a halt.
 This sediment was needed to build up sandbars and beaches, which served as habitats for wildlife.
 As a result, two fish species are extinct and two others are endangered, including the Gila cypha.
 The authorities hope that the rise in water level after the flood will be enough to restore eroded sandbars downstream, although it is only a few feet.
 No tsunami warning was issued, and according to the Geophysics agency of Jakarta, there will be no tsunami warning, as the earthquake did not reach the necessary magnitude of 6.5.
 Although there was no tsunami danger, the residents of the town panicked and began to evacuate their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey wept at her farewell, she assured her fans that she would be back.
 This will not be a farewell. This is the end of one chapter and the beginning of a new one.
 The outcome of the Presidential and Parliamentary elections in Namibia indicated that the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, was re-elected by a wide margin.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organisation, retained its majority in the parliamentary elections.
 Troops of the coalition and Afghan troops moved into the area to secure the site, and other coalition aircraft were sent to support.
 The crash occurred high up in mountainous terrain, and it is suspected that it was the result of enemy fire.
 The search for the crash site is hampered by bad weather and rough terrain.
 The medical welfare organization, Medecins Sans Frontieres, and the World Health Organisation say that this is the worst outbreak the country has ever recorded.
 Richard Veerman, speaking for doctors without borders, said,
 The games started at 10:00 a M, with great weather and, apart from some light drizzle in the morning, which soon cleared, it was an ideal day for 7s Rugby.
 South Africa, the top-ranked team in the tournament, began with a comfortable 26-00 win against Sambia, the fifth-ranked team.
 Although the team definitely looked rusty in the game against their Southern sisters, South Africa improved steadily throughout the tournament.
 Their disciplined defense, ball control and exquisite teamwork made it clear that this was the team that had to be beaten.
 Officials from the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank museum say the tree is infected with a fungus and poses a danger to public health because it could fall at any time.
 It was scheduled to be held on Tuesday, but was saved by a court of emergency.
 All of the cave entrances, also known as the Seven Sisters, have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 Infrared images show temperature differences between night and day, which indicate that it's probably a cave.
 They are colder during the day and warmer at night.
 Their thermal behavior is not as uniform as that of the larger caves on earth, which often have a fairly constant temperature, but it matches the idea of being deep holes in the ground,
 In France, voting is traditionally a low-tech experience: the voter isolates themselves in a booth and stick a pre-printed piece of paper, on which the candidate of their choice is written,
 After the officials have verified the identity of the voter, the voter throws the envelope into the ballot box and signs the voter list.
 The French election law lays out the process quite strictly.
 Since 1988, ballot boxes have had to be transparent so that voters and observers can see that no ballot papers are present at the beginning of the vote, and that no ballot papers are added after the vote.
 The candidates can send representatives to witness every part of the process, and the votes are counted by volunteers under strict supervision and according to special procedures.
 The Asus Eee PC, previously brought to the market based on Spar and Functionality factors, became a hot topic at the Taipei IT month show in 2007.
 But the consumer market for laptop computers will be radically changed after ASUS won the Taiwan Sustainable Award 2007 from the Republic of China.
 The Website of the station describes the show as a radio theater of the old school with a new and uncanny interpretation.
 In their early days, the show was only featured on the old-school Internet radio site TogiNet Radio, a site that focused on talk radio.
 At the end of 2015, TogiNet founded the AstroNet Radio branch.
 The show originally featured local amateur voice actors from East Texas.
 According to reports, extended looting went on all night, while police officers showed no presence on the streets of Bishkek.
 According to the description of an observer, Bishkek fell more and more into a state of anarchy, as gangs of people roamed through the streets and looted shops.
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the demonstrators from the South for the lawlessness.
 South Africa defeated the All Blacks of New Zealand in a Rugby Union match at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in the South African town of Rustenburg.
 The final score was a win by one point, with a score of 21 to 20, ending the All Blacks' winning streak of 15 games.
 For the Springboks, it ended a five-game losing streak.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks, who had won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The final of the tournament will be played next week at the Ellis Park Stadium in Johannesburg, where the Springboks will face Australia.
 A moderate earthquake struck the West of Montana at 22:08 on Monday.
 No immediate reports of damage were received by the United States Geological Survey and the National earthquake information center.
 The center of the earthquake was about 20 kilometers north-northeast of Dillon and about 65 kilometers south of Butte.
 It has been confirmed that the deadly H5N1 bird flu virus has infected a wild duck found dead Monday in a marshy area near Lyon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh European Union country to be hit by the virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Suspected cases of H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers sued God for the widespread death, destruction, and terrorization of many millions of earth dwellers.
 Chambers, an Agnostic, argues that his complaint is frivolous and that anyone can sue anyone.
 The story, which Camille Saint-Saens presented in the French opera, is about an artist, whose life is dominated by love of drugs and Japan.
 Therefore, the actors on the stage smoke Cannabis joints, and the theater itself encourages the audience to participate.
 The former Speaker of the House, Newt Gingrich, the Texas governor, Rick Perry, and the Congresswoman, Michele Bachmann, all reached the fourth, fifth, and sixth place respectively.
 After the results were in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but found harsh words for Romney, in whose name negative campaign ads against Gingrich had been aired in Iowa.
 Perry stated, I will return to Texas to evaluate the outcome of today's primary and to decide if there is a path forward for me in this race.
 Bachmann, who had won the Ames straw poll in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he subsequently died.
 According to reports, he was in his 20s at the time. In a statement, Bieber said, quote,
 The motor car, for example, leads to the development of roads.
 According to police, the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will likely not be charged.
 Since only eighteen medals are available per day, it has not made it to the podium.
 Including the Netherlands, where Anna Jochemsen placed ninth in the women's super-G yesterday, and Finland with Katja Saarinen, who placed tenth in the same event.
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley was eleventh in the standing Super-G, while the Czech Oldrich Jelinek was sixteenth in the sitting Super-G.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez came in as the fifteenth in the men's Super-G. The New Zealander Adam Hall came in as the ninth in the men's Super-G.
 The visually impaired Polish skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished in thirteenth place.
 The UN peacekeepers, who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake, are blamed for the outbreak of the disease, which broke out near the troops' camp.
 According to the complaint, the waste from the UN camp was not properly cleaned, which led to bacteria entering the Artibonit River, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Before the arrival of the troops, Haiti had not experienced any problems with the disease since the 1800s.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy has cited independent studies that suggest the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion may have unwittingly brought the disease to Haiti.
 Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, said the outbreak was likely caused by the blue helmets.
 Hamilton confirmed that the Howard University hospital had taken the patient in stable condition.
 The patient had been in Nigeria, where some cases of the Ebola virus had occurred.
 The hospital followed protocols for infection control, including the separation of the patient from others to prevent the spread of infection.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon had worked on several shows in various capacities.
 In the 1980s, he worked on shows like Taxi, Cheers, and the Tracey Ullman show.
 In 1989, he helped Brooks and Groening create the Simpsons and was responsible for the hiring of the show's first writing team.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of chief producer and continued to receive in every season,
 The Chinese news agency Xinhua had previously reported the planned hijacking of an airplane.
 Later reports said the plane had received a bomb threat and had been diverted to Afghanistan, where it landed in Kandahar.
 First reports say the plane was diverted back to Afghanistan after it was refused permission to land in Urumqi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, which has an outdated fleet that is poorly maintained for both civilian and military use.
 International sanctions have meant that no new planes can be bought.
 Three people were killed and three others injured in a helicopter crash at the beginning of the week.
 Last month, Iran experienced its worst airplane disaster in years, when a passenger plane crashed on its way to Armenia, killing all 168 passengers.
 In the same month, a further passenger plane shot over the end of a runway in Maschhad and crashed into a wall, killing seventeen people.
 Aerosmith have cancelled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The rock band was scheduled to tour through the United States and Canada until September 16.
 After the lead singer Steven Tyler injured himself during a performance on August 5, they canceled the rest of the tour.
 Murray lost the first set in the tiebreak after both men had held every single service game.
 Del Potro had an early advantage in the second set, but even this time a tie break was required after the 6:6 was reached.
 Potros shoulder was treated in the meantime, but he was able to return to the field.
 The program began at 20:30 local time,
 Famous singers from all over the country presented bhajans, devotional songs, to Shri Shyam's feet.
 The singer Sanju Sharma opened the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary, who also presented the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan, accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 Then Lakkha Singh took over the leadership of the Bhajans.
 Baba Shyam was served 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog,
 Lakkha Singh presented the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan as well, accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 At the keynote presentation of the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday, Nintendo President Satoru Iwata revealed the Controller design for the company's new Nintendo Revolution Console.
 Similar to a TV remote, the Controller uses two sensors, which are placed near the user's television to triangulate the user's position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in Video games by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and had to retire shortly after the start.
 His teammate led the race most of the time, but ended up just behind him after his pit stop, probably because of a badly jammed right front tire.
 Shortly after Alonso, Michael also ended his race due to damage to the suspension from the numerous fights during the race.
 She is very sweet and also sings quite well, he said, according to a transcript of the press conference.
 I was moved to tears at every rehearsal.
 About 3 minutes after takeoff, a cockpit camera showed that numerous pieces of insulating foam had broken off from the fuel tank.
 We're not going to assume that they damaged the shuttle in any way.
 N . Wayne Hale Jr, the head of NASA's shuttle program, said the foam had fallen off after the point at which we were concerned.
 After five minutes, the wind picked up, about a minute later, the wind reached 70 km per hour.
 I have lost my sister and her friend, and on my way there were two disabled people in a wheelchair, over whom people just simply jumped and shoved.
 The NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported that the earthquake had no effect and that reactors number one and two of the Shika nuclear power plant had been shut down.
 It is reported that around 9 400 houses in the region have no water and around 100 have no electricity.
 Some roads were damaged and railroad service in the affected areas was disrupted, with Noto Airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remaining closed.
 A bomb exploded in front of the governor-general's office.
 Three other bombs detonated within two hours of government buildings.
 According to some reports, the official death toll is eight, and official reports confirm that up to 30 people were injured, although no final figures are yet available.
 Both Cyanuric acid and Melamine were found in urine samples from pets that died after eating contaminated pet food.
 The two connections react with each other and form crystals, which, according to the University of California, Berkeley, researchers, can impede the kidney's function.
 The researchers discovered crystals in the cat's urine that had formed through the addition of Melamine and Cyanuric acid.
 The composition of these crystals corresponds to the composition found in the urine of affected pets when compared by infrared spectroscopy.
 I do not know if you are aware of this, but most of the goods from Central America came into our country duty-free.
 Despite this, eighty percent of our goods were taxed in Central American countries. We are looking out for you.
 This did not seem to me to be fair, and it was certainly not fair.
 I just tell people that we want to be treated the same way we treat others.
 The California governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a bill that would ban the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 The proposed law would require that video games sold in the state of California be labeled with a rating of eighteen,
 The director of public prosecutions, Kier Starmer, QC,
 Huhne has resigned and will be replaced in the cabinet by the MP Ed Davey, with the MP Norman Lamb expected to take over as the new business Secretary.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear before the Westminster magistrates court on 16 February.
 The dead were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21. Cuddeback is the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered wounds to his arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider required reconstructive surgery to his face.
 The weapon of Uka had a Ladehemmung, as he aimed at the head of a fifth man. Schneider has since then been under chronic pain, is blind in one eye, and has a part of his skull reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider said, via a Video link from a U S . Air Force base in his home state.
 Carpanedo competed in two individual races beyond Wednesday's event, taking part in the championship.
 Their first event was the slalom, in which they both failed to finish the first run. 36 of the 116 competitors received the same result.
 Her other race, the giant slalom, ended with a combined time of 4:41.30, which was 2:11.60 minutes slower than the first-place Austrian Claudia Lösch and 1:09.02 minutes faster than the ninth-place Hungarian Gyöngyi Dani.
 Four of the Krückenskifahrerinnen did not finish the race, and 45 of the 117 skiers in the Riesenslalom could not finish.
 The police in Madhya Pradesh have recovered the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 The deputy Inspector-General, D. K. Arya, said, we have arrested five people who raped the Swiss woman, and we have recovered her laptop and her mobile phone.
 The names of the accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanja, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar, and Vishnu Kanjar.
 The police chief, Chandra Shekhar Solanki, said the accused had appeared in court with their faces covered.
 Although three people were in the house when the car crashed in, no one was injured.
 The driver, however, suffered severe head injuries.
 The road on which the accident had occurred was temporarily closed while the emergency services freed the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was initially taken to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was subsequently transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya was in the meantime charged with the murder of her son at Edinburgh Sheriff Court.
 She is currently in custody awaiting trial, but eye-witness accounts of the incident may have been fabricated, as her image has been widely published.
 This is routine practice elsewhere in Britain, but Scottish justice works differently, and the courts have deemed publication of the photos to be potentially damaging.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson from the University of Dundee remarks,
 The Crown Prosecution Service, which is leading the prosecution, has indicated to journalists that it will not be making any further comments until at least the charge is laid.
 According to the leak, the document refers to the border dispute in which the Palestinians demand a return to the status quo ante,
 Other topics that are allegedly covered include the future of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the problem of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands a military presence in the Jordan Valley for ten years after the signing of the agreement, while the Palestinian authority wants such a presence only for five years.
 The guards of the accompanying experiment to control the plague should be closely supervised by horsemen, as the experiment was monitored and its effectiveness was evaluated.
 Within the framework of a partnership between NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia,
 According to Mick O'Flynn, the executive director of Park Conservation and Heritage at the NPWS, the four selected hunters received comprehensive safety and training.
 Martelly yesterday inaugurated a new Provisional Election Commission with nine members.
 It is Martelly's fifth CEP within four years.
 Last month, a Presidency Commission recommended the resignation of the previous Cepp as part of a package of measures to steer the country towards new elections.
 The Commission was Martelly's response to the widespread regime-critical protests that began in October.
 The trigger for the sometimes violent protests was the failure to hold elections, some of which had been scheduled since 2011.
 Over 60 cases of overheating have been reported, resulting in six house fires and four people suffering minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry reported that it had been notified of 27 incidents involving the devices.
 Last week, METI announced that it had been informed by apple of 34 additional cases of Overheating, which the company described as not being serious.
 The Ministry reacted by describing the delay in the report's release as being a real disappointment.
 The earthquake struck Mariana at 07:19 a M. local time,
 The office of the northern Marianas's Department of Homeland Security said no damage was reported.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said there were no indications of a tsunami.
 A former Philippine police officer has taken tourists from Hong Kong as hostages by hijacking their bus in Manila, the Philippine capital.
 Rolando Mendoza shot the tourists with his M16 rifle.
 Several hostages were rescued and there are at least six confirmed deaths.
 Six hostages, including the children and the elderly, were released early, as were the Filipino photographers.
 The photographers took the place of an older lady as she went to the toilet, and Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and pursued a career in medicine.
 He trained as a midwife and began working at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 While working in the hospital, Liggins began to study premature labour in his spare time.
 His research showed that the use of a hormone accelerated the maturation of the fetal lung.
 Xinhua reported that government investigators on Wednesday recovered two black box flight recorders.
 Ringer colleagues also paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer said, quote, Luna was the first Queen of the Extreme.
 Dustin Runnels commented, Luna was just as crazy as me,
 Of the 1,400 people surveyed before the 2010 Federal election, the proportion of those who oppose Australia becoming a Republic has increased by 8 per cent since 2008.
 The acting Prime Minister, Julia Gillard, stated during the 2010 Federal election campaign that she believed Australia should become a Republic at the end of Queen Elizabeth II's reign.
 Thirty four percent of those surveyed agree with this view and want Elizabeth II to be the last Australian monarch.
 Twenty nine percent of those surveyed said Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible, while thirty one percent said Australia should never become a Republic.
 The Olympic gold medallist was expected to compete in the 100 and 200 metre freestyle events, as well as three relay events, but his fitness was questioned due to a number of injuries.
 He was unable to take the required medication to overcome his pain, as it was banned at the Commonwealth Games.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest known prime number.
 Several people confirmed the discovery using different hardware and software in early February, and it was announced on Tuesday.
 Comets may have been a source of the earth's water supply, along with organic matter that could form proteins and make life possible.
 Since comets have been known to collide with the earth in the past, scientists are hoping to gain insights into how planets, especially the earth, form.
 Cuomo, 53, took office earlier this year and signed a bill last month to legalize same-sex marriage.
 He dismissed the rumors as political gossip and nonsense.
 It is speculated that he may run for the office of President in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that the FAA claims would allow planes to fly shorter routes and save millions of gallons of fuel each year, while reducing carbon emissions.
 It relies on satellite-based technology instead of the older technology based on ground radar to enable the air traffic controllers to locate aircraft more precisely and to provide the pilots with more accurate information.
 No additional transportation is being provided, and the surface trains will not be stopping at Wembley.
 With the concern of lacking transportation, the possibility grew that the game would have to be played without the fans of the team.
 A study published Thursday in the journal Science reported the emergence of a new bird species on the Ecuadorian Galapagos Islands.
 Researchers at Princeton University in the United States and the Uppsala University in Sweden reported that the new species had developed within only two generations, although previously it had been thought that this would take much longer due to the mating between a native Darwin finch, Geospiza fortes, and the introduced cactus finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can be processed into various forms. It can be rolled into tiny shapes.
 It can be drawn into a thin wire, which can be twisted and woven, hammered, or rolled into sheets.
 It can be made very thin and stuck onto other metal it can be made so thin that it is sometimes used to decorate hand-painted pictures, called miniatures, in books, which are called miniatures.
 This is called the pH of a chemical. You can make an indicator with red cabbage juice.
 The cabbage juice changes its color depending on how sour or basic the chemical is.
 The pH level indicates the amount of hydrogen ions in the tested chemicals.
 Hydrogen ions are protons to which electrons have been stripped.
 Mix the two dry powders together and then form them with clean, wet hands into a ball.
 The moisture on your hands reacts with the outer layers, which feels kind of weird and creates a kind of protective layer.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had flush toilets in almost every house, connected to a sophisticated drainage system.
 And the remains of sewage systems were found in the houses of the Minoan cities on Crete and Santorini in Greece.
 Even in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China, there were toilets. In Roman culture, toilets were sometimes part of public baths, which men and women visited in mixed company.
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and then reflects it almost immediately back down to the ground.
 The satellite was launched into space by a rocket, and scientists use telescopes in space because the earth's atmosphere distorts our light and our view.
 It takes a giant rocket with a height of over one hundred feet to shoot a satellite or telescope into space.
 The bicycle has changed the world in an incredible way.
 It has brought us the railroad, the automobile, and many other means of transportation.
 Among them are medium-sized cats that eat medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small cats, including stray house cats, which prey on much smaller prey, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The secret of their success is the concept of the niche, a special task that each cat has and that ensures that they do not compete with others.
 Lions are the most social of cats, living in large groups called prides.
 The packs consist of one to three related adult males and up to thirty females and young.
 Women normally have a close relationship with each other when they live in a large family with sisters and daughters.
 Lion prides act similarly to wolf or dog packs, animals that behave surprisingly like lions, but not to other big cats.
 As a versatile athlete, the tiger can climb, although not particularly well, swim, jump great distances, and pull with the strength of five men.
 The tiger belongs to the same group as lions, leopards, and jaguars, which are the only four cats that can roar.
 The tiger's roar does not sound like the full-throated roar of the lion, but rather like a sentence of growled words.
 Ocelots eat small animals, and if they can, they will hunt monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds.
 Scientists think that ocelots use their sense of smell to track and hunt prey.
 They can see in the dark with night vision and move unnoticed. Ocelots hunt by blending in with their surroundings and then pouncing on their prey.
 If a small group of living things, a small population, is separated from the main population, from which it came,
 And the other thing is that we're now in a new environment,
 The original population has not changed at all, it still needs the same adaptations as before.
 Over time, the new population begins to adapt to its new environment, and then it looks less and less like the other population.
 After thousands or even millions of years, two populations may look so different that they cannot be assigned to the same species.
 We call this process speciation, which simply means the creation of new species.
 Plants generate oxygen, which humans breathe in, and they take up the carbon dioxide that humans breathe out.
 Plants produce their food through photosynthesis, and they also give shade.
 We build our houses from plants and make clothing from plants, we eat mainly from plants, and without plants, animals could not survive.
 The Mosasaurus was the largest predator of its time, so it feared nothing but other Mosasauruses.
 His long jaws were equipped with more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, plus a further set on the palate, which meant that no creature could escape if it crossed his path.
 We don't know for sure, but he could have had a forked tongue, and he ate turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and maybe even ate some of his own kind.
 He also grabbed everything that came into the water, even a large dinosaur like the T. Rex.
 While the majority of their food may be familiar to us, the Romans had their share of odd or unusual festive meals, including wild boar, peacock, snails, and a kind of rodent called a Siebenschläfer.
 Another difference was that the poorer people and women ate their food sitting on stools, while the richer men preferred to have joint banquets,
 The courts of ancient Rome could not include foods that came from the Americas or Asia in later centuries.
 They had no corn, no tomatoes, no potatoes, no cacao, and no old Roman had ever tasted a Turkey.
 The Babylonians built a temple to each of their gods, which was considered the House of the God.
 They brought sacrifices to the gods and the priests tried to appease the will of the gods through ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and then an inner altar room that only priests were allowed to enter.
 Sometimes, special pyramid-shaped towers, called Zikkurats, were built as part of the temple.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the God.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, houses did not become as large.
 The largest part of the Hebrew family's life played outdoors.
 The women cooked in the yard. Businesses consisted of open-air shops, and stone was used for housebuilding.
 In the land of Canaan, there were no large forests, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated, and in the old Norse Sagas it is said that Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder.
 But, independent of his discovery, Eskimo tribes were already living there at that time.
 Although all the countries were Scandinavian, there were many differences between the peoples, the Kings, the customs, and the history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie, the Mummy, you may think that a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 Although on the back of the document, something is written, it is not a treasure map.
 On the back of the Declaration of Independence, the words, original Declaration of Independence, dated July 4, 1776, are written upside down.
 No one knows for sure who wrote it, but it is known that the great parchment document, which measures 29¾ inches by 24½ inches, was rolled up at the beginning of its life.
 It is possible, therefore, that the remark was added simply as a label.
 The landing at D-Day and the ensuing battles freed northern France, but the South was still not free.
 He was ruled by the Vichy French, who had made peace with the Germans in 1940 and were working with the invaders, rather than fighting them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded Southern France, and the invasion was called operation Dragoon.
 After only two weeks, the Americans and the French liberation troops had freed the South of France and turned their attention to Germany.
 A civilization is a distinctive culture shared by a significant group of people who live and work together, a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, which means civil, related to the Latin civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or city state.
 City-States are the precursors of nations, a civilized culture implies the transmission of knowledge over several generations, a lasting cultural footprint, and a proper distribution.
 Smaller cultures often disappear without leaving relevant historical records and fail to be recognized as a real civilization.
 During the revolutionary wars, the thirteen states formed a weak central government, which consisted only of the Congress.
 The Congress was not empowered to levy taxes, and since there was no national executive or national judiciary,
 He also had no power to suspend or repeal state tax laws.
 The articles required the unanimous consent of all the states before they could be amended, and the states took the central government so little seriously that their representatives often were absent.
 The Italian national football team, along with the German national football team, is the second most successful national football team in the world, and was the 2006 FIFA World Cup champion.
 Among the popular sports are football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, Rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula One motor racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions, and Italians compete in international competitions and the Olympic games.
 Japan has approximately 7,000 Islands, making it the seventh largest Island in the world.
 Because of the cluster of Islands, Japan is often geographically referred to as an Archipelago.
 The beginning of Taiwan dates back to the 15th century, when European sailors passed by and documented the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, or beautiful island.
 1624 the Dutch East India company founded a settlement in the Southwest of Taiwan, thereby leading a change in the rice cultivation methods of the aboriginals and employing Chinese workers on their rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, Qing dynasty forces took control of Taiwan's western and northern coastal regions, and in 1885, Taiwan was declared a province of the Qing dynasty.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the first Sino-Japanese war, the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki,
 Machu Picchu consists mainly of three buildings, namely the Intihuatana, the sun temple, and the room of the three windows.
 Most of the buildings at the edges of the complex have been rebuilt to give tourists a better idea of how they originally looked.
 However, by 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored, and the restoration work continues today.
 For example, the most widely used film format is 35 mm, which is the predominant film size at the end of the analog film era.
 It is still produced today, but even more importantly, its aspect ratio has been adopted by the image sensor formats of Digital cameras.
 In fact, the 35 mm format is actually 36 mm wide and 24 mm high.
 The aspect ratio of this format, divided by twelve to get the simplest integer ratio, is therefore referred to as 3:2.
 Many common formats, like the APS format family, for example, have exactly the same or a very similar aspect ratio.
 The much-maligned and often derided thirds rule is a simple guideline that creates dynamism and at the same time, keeps a measure of order in a picture.
 It states that the intersection of the lines that divide a picture vertically and horizontally is the most effective place for the main motif.
 In this period of European history, the rich and powerful Catholic Church was on trial.
 For over a thousand years, the Christian religion had held the European States together, despite different languages and customs.
 His omnipotence controlled everyone, from the King to the lowest citizen.
 One of the important Christian beliefs is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that it is the money of the churches that exists for this very purpose.
 The central power of the church had been in Rome for over a thousand years, and this concentration of power and money led many to question whether this principle had been adhered to.
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities, Britain initiated a naval blockade of Germany.
 The strategy proved effective, as it cut off the country from vital military and civilian supplies, although this blockade violated the generally accepted international law codified by several international agreements of the last two centuries.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent ships from entering whole seas, which was a danger to neutral ships as well as to the enemy.
 Because the reaction to this tactic was limited, Germany expected a similar reaction to its unrestricted U-Boat warfare.
 In the 1920s, pacifism and isolation were the prevailing attitudes of most citizens and countries.
 After the experience of the horrors and atrocities of the first World War, nations wanted to avoid another such situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States of America to take a job at the Edison company in New York City.
 He came to the USA with 4 cents in his possession, a book of poems, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor,
 The old China had a unique method of displaying different eras, each time period in China and each family that was in power, was a dynasty.
 Between the individual dynasties, there were also unstable periods of divided provinces, the best-known of which was the Three Kingdoms period, which lasted for 60 years between the Han and the Jin dynasties.
 In those days, there were bitter wars among many nobles who fought for the throne.
 The time of the three kingdoms was one of the bloodiest periods in the history of ancient China, with thousands of people dying in the struggle for the highest throne in the great Palace of Xi'an.
 There are a lot of social and political effects, such as the use of the metric system, a shift away from absolutism to Republicanism and nationalism, and the belief that the land belongs to the people, not to a ruler.
 Also, after the revolution, all professions were open to all male applicants, so that the most ambitious and best could succeed.
 The same is true of the military, for instead of class rankings based on class,
 The French Revolution inspired many oppressed people of the working class in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Mohammed was very interested in things that went beyond this everyday life, and he often visited a cave known as Hira, on the mountain of Nur,
 The cave itself has outlived the times and offers a vivid picture of Muhammad's spiritual inclinations.
 The cave is located on the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca and is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 Indeed, it is quite difficult to find, even though one knows it exists,
 You see nothing but the overlying, clear, beautiful sky and the numerous surrounding mountains from the interior of the cave, very little of this world can be seen or heard.
 The Cheops pyramid is the only one of the seven wonders of the world that still stands today.
 Built in the third century B.C. by the Egyptians, the Cheops pyramid is one of many large pyramid structures that were built to worship the dead Pharaohs.
 The Giza plateau, or Giza necropolis, in the Egyptian Valley of the Kings, comprises several pyramids, including the great pyramid, several small tombs, several temples, and the great Sphinx.
 The great pyramid was built in honor of Pharaoh Cheops and many of the smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built in honor of Cheops's wives and family members.
 The slash symbol looks like a V, and the dash symbol looks like a K.
 Upwards means that you start at the top and push the bow. Downwards means that you start at the frog, which is where your hand holds the bow, and you pull the bow.
 The brush stroke generates a softer tone, while the stroke of the brush is stronger and more expressive.
 You can add your own pencil markings, but please remember that the printed sheet markings are there for a reason.
 The panicked King Louis the fourteenth, Queen Marie-Antoinette, their two small children,
 They traveled back to Paris in a carriage, surrounded by a screaming mob of people who were shouting threats against the King and the Queen.
 The mob forced the King and the queen to open the windows of their carriage wide.
 At some point, a member of the enraged crowd swung the head of a King's-Guard killed in Versailles before the eyes of the horrified queen.
 The war expenses of the U S . Imperialists in conquering the Philippines were borne by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U S . colonial regime in order to cover the bulk of the expenses, and the interest from the bonds flowed through the Wall Street banks in the name of the Philippine government.
 Of course, the super profits, which came from the ongoing exploitation of the Philippine people, were the basic gains of U S . imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, one must understand the context that led to the founding of the order.
 The epoch in which the events took place is commonly referred to as the high Middle Ages, a period in European history that spanned the 11th, 12th, and 13th centuries.
 The early Middle Ages followed the early Middle Ages, which in turn were followed by the late Middle Ages.
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses a wide range of ideas, from the technology push or the technological imperative,
 The most common interpretations of technological determinism share two general ideas, one, that the development of technology itself follows a path that is largely beyond the realm of cultural or political influence,
 One could argue that the automobile is inevitably linked to the development of roads.
 However, a nationwide road network is economically not viable for only a small number of cars, so new production methods are being developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 The widespread automobile ownership also leads to a higher number of accidents on the roads, which in turn leads to the invention of new techniques in the health care industry to repair damaged bodies.
 The Romanticism had a strong, culturally deterministic element that drew from writers like Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 In the context of romanticism, it is geography that formed individuals, with the time, customs and cultures that arose with reference to this geography, and these, as they were in harmony with the place of the society, were better than arbitrarily oktroyierte Gesetze.
 So, like Paris is the fashion capital of the world today, Constantinople was the fashion capital of feudal Europe.
 His fame as a center of luxury began around 400 and lasted until about 1100.
 His status declined during the twelfth century, which was mainly due to the fact that the crusaders returned with gifts such as silk and spices, which were considered to be of greater value than the Byzantine markets.
 At this time, the title of fashion capital of the world also shifted from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style reached its peak in the period between the 10th and 11th centuries,
 At the beginning, the clothing was strongly influenced by the culture of Byzantium in the East.
 In the West, however, styles lagged 25 to 30 years behind.
 Towards the end of the Middle Ages, West Europe began to develop its own style, one of the most important developments of the time was that people, as a result of the Crusades, began to use buttons to fasten their clothes.
 Farming is the production of food, fiber, and other goods by a person or organization to provide for their own needs.
 The subsistence economy is a simple, often biological, form of agriculture that uses saved, locally grown seed and combines it with rotational crop or other relatively simple techniques to maximize the yield.
 In the past, most farmers practiced subsistence farming, and in many developing countries, that is still the case.
 Subcultures bring together like-minded people who feel neglected by societal norms and allow them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures may be defined in terms of age, ethnicity, class, location, and/or gender.
 The characteristics that distinguish a Subculture as such may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, or geographical in nature, or a combination of these.
 Members of a Subculture often signal their affiliation through an unmistakable and symbolic style, which includes fashion, habits, and jargon.
 One of the most common ways of illustrating the importance of socialization is to focus on a few unfortunate cases of children who have been neglected, abused, or neglected and abused.
 Some of these children were captured by humans, usually their own parents, and in some cases, the neglect of the child was due to the parents' inability to accept the child's severe intellectual or physical disabilities.
 Wolf-Kidnapped children may have experienced massive child abuse or traumatic experiences before they were exposed or ran away.
 Some were raised by animals, some lived alone in the wilderness.
 If it has been completely raised by animals, the wild child will show behavioral traits that are almost completely in accordance with those of its specific caretaker, such as its fear or indifference towards humans.
 While project-based learning should make the learning process easier and more interesting, Scaffolding goes one step further.
 Scaffolding is not a method of teaching, but rather a support that helps individuals in a novel learning situation, such as using a new computer program or beginning a new project.
 Scaffolding can be virtual as well as real. In other words, a teacher is a form of scaffolding, but so is the little office clamp in Microsoft office.
 Virtual assistance is built into the software and is supposed to question, suggest and explain work steps that the student alone might not be able to accomplish.
 Children are placed in foster care for a variety of reasons, ranging from neglect to abuse, and from coercion to extortion.
 No child should be forced to grow up in an environment that is not caring, loving and education oriented, but many are.
 For us, the system of residential care is a piece of security for these children.
 Our foster care system is supposed to provide a safe home, loving caregivers, stable education, and reliable health care.
 The foster home is supposed to meet all the needs that the child had in the home from which they were removed.
 The Internet connects elements of mass communication, but also of interpersonal communication.
 The specificities of the Internet have led to additional dimensions in terms of the benefit and reward approach.
 For example, learning and socialization are cited as important motivations for Internet use.
 Personal engagement and ongoing relationships were also identified as new motivational aspects by Eighmey and McCord (1998),
 The use of Video recordings led to important insights for the interpretation of Microexpressions, which are facial movements lasting only a few Milliseconds.
 In particular, it is claimed that one can tell if someone is lying by correctly interpreting minimal changes in the person's facial expression.
 In his article, The President's Speech, Oliver Sacks showed how people who, because of a brain injury, no longer understand language, can still correctly gauge the honesty of others.
 He even argues that the ability to interpret human behaviour is shared with animals like dogs.
 Research in the twentieth century has shown that there are two pools of genetic variation,
 Mutation provides new genetic variations, and selection removes these from the pool of expressed Variations.
 Segregation and Recombination mix the variation between the two pools with each generation,
 Out in the Savanna, it's tough for a primate with a gut like ours to get its amino acid needs from the available plant sources.
 And it has serious consequences if you don't do it: depression, malnutrition, and ultimately death.
 The easiest available plant resources would have been the proteins in leaves and legumes, but these are difficult to digest for primates like us, unless they are cooked.
 In contrast, animal foods like ants, termites, and eggs are not only easily digested, but also provide large amounts of protein, which contain all the essential amino acids.
 In summary, it should not surprise us that our own ancestors solved their protein problem in a similar way to how the chimpanzees in the Savanna do today.
 And the process of waking up during normal sleep periods and then falling asleep shortly after.
 This can be achieved by using a relatively quiet alarm clock to gently wake you up without fully waking you.
 If you're someone who imagines the alarm clock in your sleep, you can put it on the other side of the room so that you're forced to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Another biorhythm-based possibility is to drink a lot of liquid before bedtime, especially water or tea, which is known for its diuretic effect,
 The degree of inner peace a person possesses correlates inversely with the degree of tension in body and mind.
 The less tension, the more positive the life force is, and every human being has the potential to find absolute peace and contentment.
 Everyone can attain enlightenment, the only thing that stands in the way of this is our own tension and negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been expanded by the Mahayana path of love and numerous techniques of Indian Yoga.
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple it consists of Kundalini Yoga, meditation, and the path of all-embracing love.
 With Kundalini yoga, the Kundalini energy is awakened through yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras, and visualization.
 At the center of Tibetan meditation is the Guru-Yoga,
 Germany was a common enemy in World War II, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the USA. After the war, the collision of the systems, the course of events, and culture led to the countries' estrangement.
 Two years after the war, the former allies were now enemies, and the cold war began.
 He should have been in the next 40 years and in reality, through proxy armies, on battlefields from Africa to Afghanistan, Cuba, and many other places.
 On September 17, 1939, the Polish defense had already collapsed, and the only hope was in a retreat and a reorganization along the Romanian bridgehead.
 These plans, however, became almost obsolete overnight, as over 800,000 Soviet Army troops entered the Belarusian and Ukrainian fronts, after they had invaded the eastern regions of Poland in violation of the peace treaty of Riga, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact and other bilateral and multilateral international agreements.
 The use of ships for the transport of goods is by far the most efficient method of transporting large numbers of people and goods across the oceans.
 The Navy's traditional role has been to ensure that a nation remains able to transport people and goods, while at the same time, preventing the enemy from doing so.
 One of the most significant recent examples of this is the North Atlantic campaign during the second World War, when the Americans tried to bring manpower and material across the Atlantic to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German Navy tried to stop this traffic mainly with U-Boats.
 Had the Allies failed, Germany would have conquered Britain,
 Goats were apparently already domesticated in the Zagros mountains of Iran about 10,000 years ago.
 Ancient cultures and peoples began to keep them as livestock, to get easily at their milk, fur, meat, and skin.
 Normally, the goats were kept in herds that wandered around on hills or other grazing areas.
 In the sixteenth century, England had already built tramways.
 Although the track consisted of parallel wooden boards, it allowed the horses which drew the wagons to travel at higher speeds and to pull heavier loads than on the somewhat rougher roads of the time.
 Soon, thresholds were introduced to secure the position of the rails, but it was soon realized that rails, which carry a band of iron, are more efficient.
 This became the norm, but the iron caused more wear and tear on the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Finally, wooden rails were replaced by iron rails, and in 1767, the first fully iron rails were introduced.
 The first known way of getting around was walking,
 Your predecessors, the Australopithecus, did not walk upright.
 Bipedalism is found in Australopithecus fossils from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have been bipedal as early as 7 million years ago.
 We can live in a more environmentally friendly way, we can join the environmental movement, and we can even become activists to help alleviate some of the future's pain.
 In many cases, that's just like a symptomatic treatment, but if you want to get to the root of the problem, then we should find and treat the root cause.
 It is really obvious that the world has changed a lot due to the scientific and technological advancements of humanity, and that the problems of overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of humans have become much more serious.
 After its adoption by the Congress on July fourth, a handwritten draft, signed by the President of the Congress, John Hancock, and the Secretary, Charles Thomson, was sent a few blocks away to the printing press of John Dunlap.
 Between 150 and 200 copies were made over the course of the night, and are today known as the Dunlap broadsides.
 The first public reading of the document was given by John Nixon in the courtyard of independence hall on the 8th of July.
 One was sent on July 6 to George Washington, who read it to his troops in New York on July 9.
 The 25 Dunlap-Broadside copies that are still in existence are the oldest surviving copies of the document.
 Many paleontologists today believe that there is a group of dinosaurs that survived and are still living today.
 Many people do not see them as dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But many things about birds still look like dinosaurs.
 They have feet with claws and lay eggs, and they walk on both their hind legs like a Tyrannosaurus rex.
 Nearly all computers in use today are based on the processing of information that is coded in the form of Binary numbers.
 A Binary number can only have one of two values, namely 0 or 1, and these numbers are referred to as Binary digits, or Bits, to use the computer jargon.
 An internal poisoning may not be immediately apparent, the symptoms, for example, vomiting, are so general that one cannot immediately make a diagnosis.
 The best sign of poisoning by swallowing is the presence of an open container with medicines or toxic household chemicals.
 Look on the label for specific first aid instructions for this particular poison.
 The term Wasp is used by entomologists in a formal sense for this group of insects.
 This term derives from the ancient familiarity with bedbugs, which are insects that are highly adaptable in their ability to parasitize humans.
 Both bedbugs and Raubwanzen are nidicol, meaning they are adapted to live in the nest or the dwelling of their hosts.
 In the United States of America, there are about 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis, making it the most widespread neurological disease in adults of younger and middle age.
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, the spinal cord and the optic nerve.
 Studies have shown that women are twice as likely to develop MS as men.
 A couple may decide that it is not in their best interest or in the best interest of their child to raise a baby.
 These couples may choose to adopt a baby.
 In an adoption, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can assume parental rights.
 The main goal of science is to use the scientific method to figure out how the world works.
 But it's not just about experimenting, where an experiment is a test that serves to exclude one or more of the possible hypotheses.
 Scientists and philosophers concentrated on classical texts, and in particular on the Bible in the Latin language.
 Aristotle's views on all matters of science, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the loss of Greek language, the West was cut off from its philosophical and scientific roots in Greece.
 Many observed rhythms in physiology and behavior often depend in large part on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production by biological clocks.
 Behavioural patterns that are not only reactions to signals from the outside are known in most living beings, even in bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that even in the absence of external signals will run a rhythm for a time.
 The Hershey-Chase experiment was one of the key pieces of evidence that DNA is a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used Phages or viruses to insert their own DNA into a bacterium.
 They took two experiments, in which they either tagged the Phage DNA with radioactive phosphorus or tagged a protein in the Phage with radioactive sulfur.
 Mutations can have a variety of effects, depending on what kind of mutation it is, what the significance of the piece of genetic material is, and whether it's in the germ line or not.
 Only Mutations in germ cells can be passed on to children, while Mutations elsewhere can lead to cell death or cancer.
 Nature-Based tourism attracts people who are interested in visiting natural areas to enjoy the scenery, including wild plants and animals.
 Examples of on-site activities include hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visiting parks and learning about the ecosystem.
 An example of this is visiting, photographing, and studying orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave small provincial towns in their cars to go to work, and are passed by others whose workplace is at the very spot they have just left.
 In this dynamic pendulum, all are in some way connected to and supporting a transport system based on the private car.
 The science now points out that this massive carbon-based economy has taken the biosphere out of one of its stable states,
 Everyone participates in the society and uses transportation systems.
 In developed countries, you'll rarely hear similar complaints about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges.
 Why do transportation systems lead to such abuses, why do they fail every day? Are transportation engineers just incompetent? Or is something more fundamental going on here?
 Traffic flow is the study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and the interactions that take place between them.
 Unfortunately, studying traffic flows is difficult, since one cannot predict driver behavior with one hundred percent certainty.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to behave in a somewhat consistent manner, so traffic flows have a certain consistency and can be roughly represented by mathematics.
 To better illustrate the traffic flow, the relationships between the three most important characteristics were defined as follows: (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) speed.
 These relationships help with the planning, designing, and operation of facilities at the roadway.
 Insects were the first animals to conquer the sky, and their ability to fly helped them to escape predators and to find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects can fold their wings back along their body.
 And because of this, they have a wider selection of small hiding places in which to escape from predators.
 Today, dragonflies and mayflies are the only insects that cannot fold their wings back.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarch claimed that the sun was at the center of the solar system.
 Some people thought he was right, but many believed the opposite: that the sun, the planets, and even the stars, were all moving around the earth.
 That seems reasonable, since it doesn't appear to us that the earth is moving.
 The Amazon is the second longest and the second-most water-rich river in the world, carrying more than eight times as much water as the second-largest.
 The Amazon is also the widest river in the world, sometimes as wide as six miles.
 As much as twenty percent of the water that flows into the oceans of the planet comes from the Amazon.
 The Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers long,
 Although the building of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom,
 Egyptians in the ancient New Kingdom marveled at the monuments of their ancestors, which were then well over a thousand years old.
 The Vatican City has approximately 800 residents, making it the smallest independent state in the world and the country with the smallest population.
 The Vatican City uses Italian for its legislation and official communication.
 Italian is also the everyday language of most who work in the state, while Latin is often used for religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of Vatican city are Roman Catholic.
 Basic chemical elements like gold, silver and copper have been known to humans since antiquity, as these all can be found in their original form in nature and can be extracted with primitive tools.
 Aristotle, a philosopher, put forth the theory that all things are made up of a mixture of one or more of four elements, namely earth, water, air, and fire.
 This corresponded more to the four Aggregate States (in the same order): solid, liquid, gas, and plasma.
 Alloys are basically a mixture of two or more metals.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals, and of course there are other metals like silver and gold.
 There are also alloys which contain small amounts of non-metallic elements such as carbon.
 The universe consists of matter, all matter is made up of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so tiny that billions of them would fit into the point at the end of this sentence.
 As a result, the pencil became a good friend to many people after its invention.
 Unfortunately, the pencil has been pushed into the background with the advent of newer writing methods, so that it has been pushed into the background in its status and in its use.
 Nowadays, people write messages on computer screens without ever having to come close to a typewriter.
 One may be curious to see what will emerge from the keyboard when something newer comes along.
 The atomic bomb relies on the principle that you need energy to bring together a nucleus with lots of protons and neutrons.
 This is like rolling a heavy wagon up a hill, and when the core is split again, some of that energy is released.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means that they will decay at the slightest or even no provocation.
 The surface of the moon consists of rock and dust, the outer layer of the moon is called the crust.
 The outer layer of the moon is called the crust.
 It is thinner under the mare and thicker under the highland.
 On the near side, there could be more Maria, since the crust is thinner, and it was easier for the lava to rise to the surface.
 In-depth theories focus on finding what moves and appeals to people.
 These theories suggest that humans have certain needs and or desires that are internalized over the course of their adulthood.
 These theories concern themselves with what makes certain people want to do exactly the things they do, and what influences in their environment cause them to do or not to do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Hertzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, there are two ways in which managers may begin to lead their former colleagues.
 This type of manager has problems making unpopular decisions, taking disciplinary action, making performance assessments, allocating responsibilities and holding employees to account.
 At the other end of the spectrum, one becomes a non-recognizable individual who has to change everything the team has done and take ownership of everything.
 Ultimately, the team leader is responsible for the team's success and failure.
 This behavior often leads to conflicts between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams are managed according to the same excellence standards as conventional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as a contact point for their immediate physical group.
 They often have more autonomy than traditional team members, as their teams may be located in different time zones that are not considered by the local leadership.
 The presence of a real invisible team is also a unique component of a virtual team.
 The invisible team is the leadership team to which every member reports.
 Why would an organization take on the time-consuming process of implementing a learning organization?
 When all the available resources are effectively utilized across all the departments of an organization, creativity and innovation can flourish.
 In the end, the collective work of an organization can lead to a new innovative method of meeting customer needs.
 Before an organization can be innovative, the leadership must develop a culture of innovation, shared knowledge, and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) explains the continuum concept as a method to help organizations become more performance-oriented.
 Neurobiological data provide physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition, thereby defining the field and making it much more precise.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior supports scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various kinds of brain damage, such as trauma, injury and tumors, affect behavior and cause changes in some brain functions.
 Emerging Technologies are allowing us to see and to explore certain brain structures and processes for the first time.
 This provides us with a lot of information and material to build simulation models that help us to understand the processes in our head.
 KI, though strongly associated with science fiction, is a major branch of computer science that deals with the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of machines.
 Research in the field of ai includes the creation of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Examples of this include steering, setting up strategies and timelines, the ability to answer customer diagnoses and questions, as well as handwriting, voice and facial recognition.
 Such things have become their own disciplines, concentrating on finding solutions to real-life problems.
 The ai system is today often used in the areas of economics, medicine, engineering and the military, and is also built into numerous software applications for home computers and video games.
 Excursions are an important part of every school class, and not infrequently a teacher would like to take her or his pupils to places which are not accessible by bus.
 Virtual field trips are a technological solution whereby students can view museum pieces, visit an Aquarium, or view works of art from the comfort of their classroom.
 A virtual field trip is also a great way to reflect on a journey and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, every year, students at Bennet high school in North Carolina design a Website about their trip to the state capital.
 Blogs can also help to improve the writing skills of students, although at the beginning of their Blogging experience,
 Since students are often a very critical audience, the Blog author tries to improve his writing style to avoid criticism.
 Blogging, he writes, also forces the students to learn more about the world around them.
 Blogging is a tool that inspires collaboration and encourages students to continue learning far beyond the traditional school day.
 The appropriate use of Blogs can enable students to become more analytical and critical,
 Ottawa is Canada's charming, bilingual capital and is marked by a range of art galleries and museums that present Canada's past and present.
 Further south are the Niagara falls, and to the North, the untouched beauty of nature in Muskoka and beyond.
 All of these things and more make Ontario stand out as what outsiders consider to be typically Canadian.
 There are large areas further north that are sparsely populated, and some are almost uninhabited wilderness.
 A population comparison that many will find surprising: There are more African-Americans living in the United States than there are Canadians.
 The East African Islands are located in the Indian Ocean, off the East Coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and, in terms of animal life, a continent unto itself.
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent nations or belong to France and are known as luxurious seaside resorts.
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the country, and in the Comoros and Mayotte it has been very successful.
 European influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when the Portuguese seafarer Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape route from Europe to India.
 In the North, the region is bounded by the Sahel zone and in the South and West by the Atlantic Ocean.
 It is recommended that all female travelers claim to be married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 Also, wearing a ring is helpful,
 Women should recognize that cultural differences can lead to what they would consider an assault, and that it's not unusual to be followed,
 Stay consistent when you reject men and don't be afraid to defend your position,
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century BC, and was used by the Phoenicians, Romans, and Merinids as a strategic port with the name Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed it and rebuilt it under the name Casa Branca, only to abandon it after an earthquake in 1755.
 The Moroccan Sultan rebuilt the city as Dar el Beida and it was renamed Casablanca by Spanish traders who set up trading posts there.
 Casablanca is one of the most uninteresting places to shop in all of Morocco.
 Around the old Medina, it's easy to find places where traditional Moroccan wares like tagines, pottery, leather goods, water pipes, and a whole range of Tinnef are sold, but that's only for the tourists.
 Goma is a tourist town in the Democratic Republic of the Congo in the far East near Ruanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried most of the city's roads, especially the town center, under itself.
 While Goma is reasonably safe, any stay outside of Goma should be carefully planned to learn about the ongoing conflict in the North Kivu province.
 The city is also the starting point for the ascent of Nyiragongo volcano and for some of the cheapest gorilla tracking tours in Africa.
 You can use Bodabodas, which are motorcycle taxis, to get around Goma. The usual price is around 500 Congolese francs for the short ride.
 This, in combination with its relative inaccessibility, has led to Timbuktu being used as a metaphor for exotic, far-off lands.
 Although Timbuktu is known as a tourist attraction and has an airport, it is now a poor town.
 In 1990 it was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites due to the threat of desertification.
 It was one of the most important stops on Louis Gates' PBS special, Wonders of the African World.
 The city stands in stark contrast to the rest of the country's cities, because it has a more Arabic than an African feel.
 The Kruger National Park lies in the northeast of South Africa, bordering Mozambique to the east, Zimbabwe to the North, and the Crocodile River to the South.
 The park has an area of 19,500 square kilometres and is divided into 14 different ecozones, each of which supports a different animal world.
 He is one of the main attractions of South Africa and is regarded as the flagship of the South African National Parks.
 Like all South African national parks, it charges a daily conservation fee.
 It may also be worthwhile to buy a Wild Card, which allows entry to selected parks in South Africa or to all South African National parks.
 Hong Kong Island is the name of the territory Hong Kong and stands at the center of many tourists' attention.
 The buildings that make up the Hong Kong skyline were compared with a shimmering Balkendiagram that becomes visible through the presence of the Victoria Harbour's waters.
 For the best views of Hong Kong, you should leave the island and take a ferry to the opposite shore of Kowloon.
 The majority of Hong Kong Island's urbanization is dense and packed along the North Coast.
 This is the site of the British colonial past, and if you're looking for traces of the colonial past, this is a good place to start.
 The Sundarbans are the largest mangrove forest in the world, and extend 80 kilometers from the Bangladeshi and Indian hinterland to the coast.
 The Sundarbans were designated a UNESCO world heritage site, and the part of the forest that lies within the Indian state is designated as the Sundarbans National Park.
 The forests, however, are not just Mangrove swamps they also contain some of the last remaining patches of the mighty jungle that once covered the Ganges plain.
 The Sundarbans extend over an area of 3,850 square kilometres, of which a third is covered by water and marshes.
 The Sundarbans have been a nature reserve since 1966, and estimates suggest that there are now 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer.
 Buses run all day from the district-wide bus station,
 Since buses between the districts are often full, it is advisable to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 The most districts are served by small Japanese Coaster buses, which are comfortable and stable.
 Sammeltaxis offer a quick and comfortable way to get to nearby places like Paro (Nu 150) and Punakha (Nu 200).
 The Oyapock River Bridge is a suspension bridge that spans the Oyapock River and connects the cities of Oiapoque in Brazil and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 Their two towers are 83 meters high, their length is 378 meters and they have two lanes with a width of 3.50 meters.
 The clearance under the bridge is 15 meters. The construction works were completed in August 2011, but the opening for traffic was only in March 2017.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational by September 2017, and it is expected that the Brazilian customs control points will be completed by then.
 The Guarani were the most important indigenous group that inhabited the present-day East Paraguay.
 The Chaco region was also home to other groups of indigenous peoples, such as the Guaycurú and the Payaguá, who survived by hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 Paraguay, formerly called the great province of West Indies, originated in the 16th century as a result of the Spanish conquerors meeting the indigenous groups.
 The Spanish began a three-century-long period of colonization.
 Since the founding of Asuncion in 1537, Paraguay has managed to preserve much of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having the best polo team and players in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year is held in December at Las Cañitas Polo fields.
 Smaller tournaments and matches can be watched at other times of the year.
 Information on competitions and sales outlets for polo tickets can be found at the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Pound, whose value is pegged to that of the British pound.
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank on the island, which is located opposite the FIC West store in Stanley.
 The British pound is basically accepted everywhere on the Islands and at Stanley, and U S . dollars are also frequently accepted.
 On the remote Islands, credit cards are unlikely to be accepted, although British and U S . currency may be accepted, so inquire in advance with the owners of the property which method of payment is accepted.
 It is almost impossible to exchange the currency of the Falkland Islands outside the Islands themselves, so you should exchange the money before you leave the Islands.
 Since Montevideo lies south of the equator, it is summer there when it is winter in the northern hemisphere, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics, and in the summer months, temperatures of over 30 °C are common.
 The winter can be deceptively cool: The temperatures rarely go below freezing, but wind and humidity make it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no distinctive rainy or dry seasons, as the amount of rainfall remains about the same throughout the year.
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to seeing people, the wildlife is still wild and should not be fed or disturbed.
 According to the park's direction, visitors should keep at least 100 yards from bears and wolves, and 25 yards from all other wild animals.
 No matter how peaceful bison, Wapitis, Elk, bears, and practically all the big animals can appear,
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they do not keep enough distance.
 Be aware, however, that odors can attract bears and other wildlife, so avoid carrying or cooking strongly scented foods, and keep your camp clean.
 Apia is the capital of Upolu, the largest of the Samoan Islands, and has a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The port was the scene of an ignominious standoff between the Navy in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Britain refused to leave.
 All but one of the British ships were sunk, and almost 200 Americans and Germans were killed.
 During the Mau movement's organized independence struggle, a peaceful rally in the city led to the killing of the top chief Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 Auckland stretches across two harbours, so there are many beaches, the most popular of which are in three areas.
 The beaches of North Shore lie on the Pacific ocean and stretch from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 Almost all are sandy beaches with safe swimming and most offer shade, which is provided by Pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki drive are located at the Waitemata harbour, in the affluent suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers in central Auckland.
 There are family beaches, which are sometimes crowded, with a nice shopping promenade along the coast, and the swimming is safe.
 The most important local beer is called Number One, which is not a complex beer, but it is pleasant and refreshing.
 There are many French wines to drink, but the New Zealand and Australian wines are perhaps a little bit more palatable.
 The local tap water is perfectly safe to drink, but if you're worried, you'll also find bottled water easily.
 For Australians, the idea of a flat white is foreign, a small espresso, cappuccino is high with foam,
 The hot chocolate is of Belgian standards, and fruit juices are expensive but excellent.
 Many dives take place throughout the year and injuries from any of these causes are rare.
 Yet, you should follow the advice of authorities, heed all signs, and pay particular attention to safety warnings.
 Jellyfish occur in the vicinity of beaches and in the vicinity of river mouths from October to April, north of 1770.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack humans, most sharks are afraid of humans and would swim away.
 Saltwater crocodiles do not live in the sea, their primary habitat is in the estuaries north of Rockhampton.
 A booking in advance gives the traveller the assurance that when he or she arrives at the destination, there will be a place to stay.
 Travel agents often have deals with specific hotels, although you may also book other accommodation through a travel agent, such as a tented camp.
 Travel agencies usually offer packages that include breakfast, transportation to and from the airport, or even a combination of flight and hotel.
 You can also hold your reservation for you, if you need time to reconsider the offer or to obtain further documents for your destination, such as a Visa.
 Any changes or requests should be directed first to the travel agency and not to the hotel directly.
 At some festivals, the large majority of festival-goers decide to camp on site, and most festival-goers think this is an important part of the experience.
 If you want to be close to the action, you'll need to get there early to get a camping spot near the music.
 Remember that on parts of the festival, there'll still be music playing late into the night, even though the music on the main stages has stopped.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you're crossing the northern East Sea in winter, check the cabin's location, as the breaking of ice causes a very, very loud noise for those who are most affected.
 The cruises to St . Petersburg also offer time for a stay in the city. Cruise passengers are exempt from the visa requirement.
 Casinos are usually very keen to keep people inside for as long as possible,
 They usually have a special offer of food, drink and entertainment to keep the guests happy and ensure they stay.
 Some gambling establishments offer alcoholic beverages for free, but intoxication impairs judgment, and all good players know how important it is to remain sober.
 If you're going to travel in high altitudes or over mountain passes, you should expect snow, ice and temperatures below freezing.
 On icy and snowy roads, the liability is low and one cannot drive as if one were on bare asphalt.
 In a snowstorm, so much snow can fall in a very short time that one can get stuck.
 The visibility can also be impaired by falling or blowing snow, or by condensation or ice on the vehicle windows.
 On the other hand, freezing and snowy conditions are normal in many countries, and traffic runs mostly uninterrupted throughout the year.
 Safaris are perhaps the greatest tourist attraction in Africa and the highlight for many visitors.
 The term safari in common usage refers to a land trip,
 Some animals, like elephants and giraffes, tend to get close to cars, and the standard equipment allows for a good view.
 Lions, cheetahs and Leopards are often shy and you can see them better with a telescope.
 A foot safari, also called a Bushwalk, is a hike that lasts for a few hours or several days.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events being held at other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Olympic summer games, after having hosted the 1964 games.
 If you've already booked your flights and accommodation for 2020 before the postponement was announced, you could find yourself in a difficult situation.
 The cancellation policies vary, but as of late March, most cancellation policies were not going to apply until July 2020, when the Olympics were scheduled to be held.
 It is estimated that most tickets for the event will cost between 2,500 yen and 130,000 yen, with an average ticket costing around 7,000 yen.
 Drying wet clothes can help them to dry faster, and many hotels provide ironing boards and irons, even if you are not in the room.
 If no iron is available, or one does not wish to wear ironed socks, one can try using a hair dryer if one is available.
 Be careful the fabric doesn't get too hot, or it may shrink or cause burns.
 There are several different ways of purifying water, some of which are more effective than others in dealing with certain contaminants.
 In some areas, it takes only a minute to boil water, in others, it takes several minutes.
 The effectiveness of filters varies greatly, and if you have any concerns, then you should consider buying your water in a sealed bottle from a reputable company.
 Travellers may encounter animal pests that they are unfamiliar with from their home regions.
 Pests can destroy food, cause irritation, or at worst, cause allergic reactions, administer poison, or transmit disease.
 Infections as such or dangerous animals that can injure or kill humans are not usually classified as pests.
 Duty-Free shopping is the ability to buy goods that are exempt from duties and taxes at certain locations.
 Travellers whose destination has a high tax rate can sometimes save a considerable amount of money, especially on products like alcoholic beverages and tobacco.
 The section between Point Marion and Fairmount on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway is the most challenging,
 If you're not used to driving on country roads, stay alert: steep grades, narrow lanes and sharp curves are the norm here.
 The indicated speed limits are markedly lower than in the preceding and following sections,
 But interestingly, the mobile phone coverage here is much better than in many other areas of the route, such as the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German baked goods are quite tasty, and in Bavaria they are quite rich and varied, as well as being quite rich and varied in the neighboring country of Austria.
 Obstgebäck is widely available, with apples being sold throughout the year and cherries and plums being used in the summer.
 Many German baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts or other nuts.
 If you want to make small but rich pastry, then try what is known in different regions as Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen.
 A curry is a dish that is based on herbs and spices, together with either meat or vegetables.
 A curry can be either dry or wet depending on the amount of liquid used.
 In the interior of North India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries,
 With a selection of 17,000 Islands, Indonesian food is an umbrella term that encompasses a wide variety of regional cuisines found throughout the country.
 But when used without further attributes, the term generally refers to the food that originated in the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Today, the cuisine of Java is widespread throughout the Indonesian archipelago,
 The stirrups are aids for the feet of the rider, which hang down on both sides of the saddle.
 They give the rider more stability, but there are safety concerns because the rider's feet could potentially get caught in them.
 If a rider falls off the horse and gets his foot caught in the stirrup, he can be dragged along if the horse continues to run.
 First of all, most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a smooth, narrow sole.
 In addition, some saddles, particularly English saddles, have safety stirrups that allow a stirrup leather to fall from the saddle as soon as it is pulled from a rider who falls.
 The Cochamó Valley, Chile's most important climbing destination, known as the Yosemite National Park of South America, with a variety of large Granite walls and cliffs.
 The peaks offer a breathtaking view, and climbers from all over the world are constantly discovering new routes along the walls, which offer endless possibilities.
 Downhill sports like skiing and snowboarding are popular sports where one attaches skis or a snowboard to their feet and rides down a slope.
 Skiing is a popular recreational activity with many enthusiasts, sometimes known as ski penny, who plan their entire vacation around skiing at a particular resort.
 The idea of skiing is very old, cave paintings with depictions of skiers date back to 5000 BC.
 The origins of skiing as a sport go back at least to the 17th century, and in 1861 the first recreational ski club in Australia was opened by Norwegians.
 Skiing with a backpack: This activity is also called ski touring or ski mountaineering.
 It is similar to alpine touring, but does not necessarily include it, as alpine touring is done in steep terrain and requires much firmer ski and boot.
 Consider the ski route like a comparable hiking route.
 In good conditions, you're able to cover somewhat larger distances than when hiking, but you'll rarely reach the speed of cross-country skiing without a heavy rucksack.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but it has numerous independent countries, and it is normal to have to apply for visas and to go through several passport controls when travelling through several countries.
 The Schengen area, however, works a little bit like a country in this regard.
 As long as you remain in this zone, you can normally cross the borders without having to go through passport control again.
 You do not need to apply for a visa to each of the Schengen Member States, which saves you time, money and bureaucracy.
 There is no universally accepted definition of what constitutes an antique, and some tax authorities define antiques as objects over 100 years old.
 The definition has geographic deviations, where the age limit in places like North America may be lower than in Europe.
 Handmade products could be described as antique, even though they are newer than similar mass-produced items.
 Reindeer husbandry is an important source of livelihood for the Sámi, and the culture around the trade is also important for many who work in other professions.
 Also in the past, not all Sámi have raised reindeer, but have lived from fishing, hunting and similar.
 Today, many Sámi work in modern professions, and tourism is an important source of income in Sápmi, the Sámi region.
 Even though the term ""Zigeuner"" is used primarily by Non-Roma, it is often perceived as being offensive, as it is associated with negative stereotypes and inaccurate perceptions of Roma.
 If a travel advisory is issued for the country you are visiting, your travel insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You can also consult the advice of other governments, but whose advice is only for their own citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may be confronted with other situations than Europeans or Arabs.
 The briefings are only a short summary of the political situation in a country.
 The views presented are often superficial, general and, in comparison to the more detailed information that can be found elsewhere,
 Weather is the umbrella term for any dangerous weather phenomenon with the potential to cause damage, severe social disruption or the loss of human life.
 Weather can occur anywhere on the planet, and there are different types of it that depend on geography, topography, and atmospheric conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, excessive rainfall and forest fires are forms and effects of severe weather, as are thunderstorms, tornadoes, water spouts and cyclones.
 Regional and seasonal weather phenomena include blizzards, snowstorms, ice storms, and dust storms.
 Travellers are urged to watch out for any type of severe weather that may affect their travel plans.
 Everyone who plans to travel to a war zone should get professional training.
 A Google search for a course on hostile environments will likely bring up the address of a local firm.
 A course will cover all the problems discussed here in much more detail, usually in combination with practical experience.
 A course is usually between two and five days long and includes role-playing, a lot of first aid and sometimes weapons training.
 There are numerous books and journals on survival in the wilderness, but only a few publications on war zones.
 Travellers who are planning to have a gender reassignment surgery overseas must ensure that they have valid travel documents for their return.
 The willingness of governments to issue passports with an unspecified gender,
 The willingness of foreign governments to recognise these documents is also very different.
 The searches at security checkpoints have become much more intrusive since the 11th of September 2001.
 Transgender people should not expect their privacy and dignity to be intact when they pass through the scanners.
 Rip currents are the returning tide of waves that break on the shore, often at reefs or similar structures.
 Because of the underwater topography, the outflow concentrates in a few deeper areas, and a swift current can form there.
 Most deaths occur from exhaustion when trying to swim against the current, which can prove to be impossible.
 When you get out of the current, it's not as hard to swim back as it would be in a normal situation.
 Try to get somewhere where you won't be caught, or, if you've been spotted, maybe wait for rescue.
 The return shock comes earlier than the culture shock, and lasts longer.
 It is easy for those who adapt easily to the new culture, but it is sometimes very hard for them to adapt again to their own culture.
 When you come back from a foreign country, you have adapted to a different culture and dropped some of your home country's behavior.
 When you first traveled abroad, the people were probably patient and understanding because they knew travelers have to adjust to a new place.
 One might not expect that even returning travelers would need patience and understanding.
 The sound and light show at the pyramids is one of the most interesting attractions for children in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark, and while it's quiet, before the show begins.
 One hears the sounds of tourists and vendors all the time, and the story of the sounds and the lights is like a history book.
 The Sphinx is used as a background and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are depicted on the pyramids, with the various pyramids being illuminated.
 The South Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, are claimed by several countries and have the most stations, with sixteen active in 2020.
 The archipelago lies 120 km north of the mainland, the largest being King George Island with the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas.
 Other Islands are Livingston Island and Deception, where the flooded Caldera of an still active volcano forms a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworthland is the region south of the Halbinsel, which is bounded by the Bellingshausen Sea.
 The mountains of the peninsula here go into the plateau and then rise again to form the 360 km long chain of the Ellsworth mountains, which are divided by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part or the Sentinel range has the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson massif, whose highest peak is Mount Vinson, at 4,892 m.
 In remote areas without mobile phone coverage, a satellite phone may be the only option.
 A satellite phone is generally no substitute for a mobile phone, since one has to be outdoors and in clear line of sight of a satellite in order to make a call.
 The service is often used by ships, including pleasure craft, as well as by expeditions that need data and voice communications.
 Your local telephone service provider should be able to give you further information about the service.
 A growing option for people who are planning to take a year out of their lives to study and travel is to go on a gap year.
 This is especially popular with high school graduates, as it allows them to take a gap year before entering university.
 In many cases, participation in a foreign exchange year program can actually improve your chances of getting into college in your home country.
 As a rule, there is a fee for registering to these educational programs.
 Finland is a great destination for boating holidays. The land of a thousand lakes also has thousands of Islands, both in the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 For the Archipelago and lakes, you don't necessarily need a yacht.
 Even though the coastal island groups and the largest lakes are actually large enough for any yacht, smaller boats or even Kayaks offer a different experience.
 Boating is the national pastime in Finland, with one in six or eight Finns owning a boat.
 This is, however, comparable to Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but otherwise quite unique.
 Most pure Baltic cruises include a longer stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 This means that you can visit the historic town for several whole days, while you return in the evening and spend the night on the ship.
 If you are only going ashore during the Bordexkursionen, you do not need a separate visa.
 Some cruises offer Berlin in Germany as a destination in their brochures, but as you can see on the map, Berlin is far from the sea, and a visit to the city is not included in the price of the cruise.
 For people in any age and from any background, flying can be a daunting experience, especially if they've never flown before or have had a traumatic experience.
 For this, he said, we must not be ashamed, for it is nothing else than the personal fears and antipathies that many people have.
 To learn more about the functioning of aircraft and the procedures during a flight can help some to overcome the fear that is associated with the unknown or with the feeling of not having any control.
 Courier firms are well paid for the speedy delivery of things, often the time is a very important factor in business documents, commercial goods, or spare parts for urgent repairs.
 On some routes, the larger firms used their own planes, but on other routes and with smaller firms, difficulties arose.
 When they sent things via air freight, the unloading and customs clearance on some routes could take several days.
 The only way to get it through the airport quicker was to send it as abandoned baggage.
 The obvious method of getting into first or business class is to pay a thick wad of cash for the privilege, or, even better, to get your own company to pay for it.
 That is not cheap, however: as a rough guide, you can expect to pay up to four times the normal economy fare for business and up to eleven times the normal economy fare for first.
 In general, it is pointless to look for discounts on direct flights from A to B even for business or first-class seats.
 Airlines know very well that there is a certain core group of people who are willing to pay a lot of money to get to their destination quickly and comfortably.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau, and the main language spoken is Romanian, although many people also speak Russian.
 Moldova is a Multi-Ethnic Republic that has suffered ethnic conflict.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the founding of the self-proclaimed Transnistrian Republic in eastern Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of the political negotiations, the economic relations between these two parts of the Republic of Moldova could be restored.
 The most important religion in Moldova is the Christian Orthodox.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million, the second largest port after Istanbul and a very good transportation hub.
 The once ancient city of Smyrna is today a modern, progressive and busy business centre, situated on a huge Bay and surrounded by mountains.
 The wide boulevards, glass-covered buildings and modern shopping centers are marked by classic red tile roofs, the market from the 18th century, as well as old mosques and churches, although the city has a more Mediterranean European atmosphere than that of traditional Turkey.
 The village of Haldarsvik offers a view of the nearby Island of Eysturoy and has an unusual octagonal church.
 There are some interesting marble sculptures of doves on the cemetery.
 It is worthwhile to wander around the fascinating village for half an hour.
 In the North and in the immediate vicinity lies the romantic and fascinating town of Sintra, which became known to foreigners after Lord Byron had described its beauty in glowing colors.
 The Scotturb-Bus 403 runs regularly over Cabo da Roca to Sintra.
 Also, in the North, visit the great shrine of Our Lady of Fatima, a place world-famous for its Marian apparitions.
 Please bear in mind that you are visiting a mass grave and a place of great significance to a huge proportion of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women who have survived their time here, and many others with relatives who were murdered or worked to death, Jews and Non-Jews alike.
 Please treat this site with the dignity, the awe, and the respect that it deserves.
 Do not deface the site by adding or scratching graffiti.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish, with about half the population preferring Catalan, the vast majority understanding it, and almost everyone else being able to speak it.
 But most of the signs are only in Catalan, as it is the first official language.
 And yet, Spanish is also widely spoken in public transportation and other facilities.
 Normal announcements are made in Catalan, but unforeseen disruptions are reported by an automated system in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are said to be egotistical, rude and arrogant.
 Even though this is often only a misleading cliché, one finds oneself in Paris at one's best when one shows one's best side and acts like someone who is well brought up.
 The brusque exterior of the Parisian disappears quite quickly if you show basic manners.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is heavily wooded, with mainly beech, fir and pine, and offers a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 It has a remarkable diversity of plant communities, thanks to its many microclimates, different soils and varying altitudes.
 The area is also home to a huge diversity of animal and bird life.
 There are rare fauna such as European Brown bears, wolves, Eagles, Owls, Lynx, Wildcats and many generally commoner species.
 When visiting the monasteries, women must wear skirts that cover their knees and also cover their shoulders.
 In most monasteries, there are indeed winding gowns for women who come unprepared, but if you bring your own, especially one in bright colors,
 Similarly, men must wear pants that go over the knee.
 These can also be borrowed from the collection at the entrance, but the clothes are not washed after each user, so you may not feel comfortable in these uniforms.
 The Mallorcan cuisine, like that of similar Mediterranean areas, is based on bread, vegetables and meat, especially pork.
 A simple, popular evening meal, especially in the summer, is Pa amb Oli: bread with olive oil, tomatoes, and any other available ingredients like cheese, tuna, etc.
 All nouns begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important way to distinguish between some verbs and objects.
 It makes reading easier, but writing is somewhat difficult because one has to determine whether a verb or a noun is used as the main word.
 The Italian language is relatively easy to learn, as most words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The most important letters to watch out for are c and g, as their pronunciation varies depending on the vowel that follows.
 They also try to distinguish between the two,
 The Persian language has a relatively simple and largely regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this introductory grammar will help you to learn a lot about Persian grammar and to understand the Persian sentences much better.
 If you speak a Romance language, it's a lot easier to learn Portuguese.
 People who speak some Spanish might be tempted to think that Portuguese is so similar that it doesn't need to be learned.
 Vintage or modern, they are no longer in operation and serve as museums or educational sites.
 During the high phase of light pollution, which is not the problem it is today,
 Most of the modern research telescopes are huge facilities in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The viewing of cherry blossoms, known as Hanami, has been a part of Japanese culture since the 8th century.
 The concept originated in China, where peach blossoms are the flower of choice.
 In Japan, the first cherry blossom festivals were held by the Emperor only for himself and other nobles in the Emperor's court.
 Plants look their best in their natural environment, so resist the temptation to remove even one.
 If you visit a formally laid out garden and take some samples, you will also be thrown out without discussion.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place, where you can find your way around and almost everything you need after you arrive.
 Since you are in the extreme Tropics and only a few degrees north of the equator, you must expect both heat and strong sunlight.
 There are also a few buses that go North to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the Biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, and their wives.
 Make sure the bus you are taking goes to Hebron and not just to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a good basis for planning a holiday.
 For example, a tour of the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, or a cruise to interesting cities on the Danube or a boat ride along the Erie Canal.
 They also provide popular hiking and biking routes.
 In Christianity, Christmas is one of the most important holidays and is considered the birthday of Jesus.
 Many of the traditions around the holiday have been adopted by non-believers in Christian and Non-Christian countries.
 There is a tradition of spending Easter night at some open place to watch the sunrise.
 There are of course Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it could also be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 Traditional churches often hold an Easter Vigil on Saturday evening, during the Easter weekend, where the celebrations of the churches often begin at midnight, celebrating the resurrection of Christ.
 All the animals that originally arrived on the Islands came here by swimming, flying, or by being washed ashore.
 Due to the great distance from the mainland, mammals were unable to make the journey, which made the giant tortoise the main prey on the Galapagos Islands.
 Since the first humans entered the Galapagos Islands, many mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, rats, cats, and dogs.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic regions in the winter, you will experience the polar night, which means that the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 This offers a good opportunity to see the northern lights, as the sky is more or less dark all around the clock.
 Since the areas are sparsely populated and light pollution is often not a problem, you can also enjoy the night sky.
 Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners might be used to.
 Suits are part of the business attire, and colleagues address each other by their family names or job titles.
 The harmony at work is of crucial importance, with the focus being on the group's performance rather than on praising individual achievements.
 Often, employees must seek the approval of their supervisors for all decisions they make, and it is expected of them that they will unconditionally follow the instructions of their bosses.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.35522455529138164, 'precisions': [0.6849079332300809, 0.44498920474991005, 0.3090951932139491, 0.2179334916864608], 'brevity_penalty': 0.9384335030326427, 'length_ratio': 0.9402532260021844, 'translation_length': 23244, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 61.095679862387065, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8612771538700982, 'scores': [0.7475346922874451, 0.7927000522613525, 0.9074230790138245, 0.7148793339729309, 0.7703337073326111, 0.7793503403663635, 0.9207804203033447, 0.8851672410964966, 0.8778510689735413, 0.9394522309303284, 0.9173671007156372, 0.8988720178604126, 0.9316228628158569, 0.8919505476951599, 0.8144305348396301, 0.8677076101303101, 0.9076384902000427, 0.8506066203117371, 0.8835373520851135, 0.8485265374183655, 0.92479008436203, 0.9409624934196472, 0.8631665110588074, 0.799971342086792, 0.8600887060165405, 0.8996228575706482, 0.8402519822120667, 0.861704409122467, 0.8572319746017456, 0.9399998188018799, 0.6537230014801025, 0.7177401185035706, 0.7854303121566772, 0.9091809988021851, 0.9353339076042175, 0.9126523733139038, 0.9074390530586243, 0.8502776026725769, 0.8377711772918701, 0.8569164872169495, 0.8827652931213379, 0.913757860660553, 0.9297990202903748, 0.8859919309616089, 0.8817956447601318, 0.5058178305625916, 0.8690313100814819, 0.9176698327064514, 0.9134986996650696, 0.8909233212471008, 0.9253929257392883, 0.9374421238899231, 0.8944653272628784, 0.9030152559280396, 0.9235377907752991, 0.8885099291801453, 0.7646676301956177, 0.8882216811180115, 0.8883428573608398, 0.951173722743988, 0.8010283708572388, 0.9227511882781982, 0.8810991048812866, 0.8463899493217468, 0.8190469145774841, 0.8908942341804504, 0.8608306050300598, 0.8488683104515076, 0.9052429795265198, 0.8542121648788452, 0.910311758518219, 0.8581120371818542, 0.820761501789093, 0.8606703281402588, 0.8729651570320129, 0.7798797488212585, 0.7751869559288025, 0.9171931147575378, 0.8636162877082825, 0.908688485622406, 0.8657658696174622, 0.8934348225593567, 0.8706033229827881, 0.8712802529335022, 0.7954940795898438, 0.7895501852035522, 0.7606799006462097, 0.8748437166213989, 0.9321421980857849, 0.8698400855064392, 0.8456835150718689, 0.8627654910087585, 0.8900618553161621, 0.9698315262794495, 0.8150286078453064, 0.9325180053710938, 0.84135901927948, 0.8858867287635803, 0.4557854235172272, 0.858812153339386, 0.9301887154579163, 0.8928877711296082, 0.8926376700401306, 0.9729158282279968, 0.893531084060669, 0.7691603302955627, 0.911197304725647, 0.8744136095046997, 0.6713247895240784, 0.8664231300354004, 0.8917551636695862, 0.9268912672996521, 0.97328120470047, 0.9160057902336121, 0.8661049008369446, 0.8063495755195618, 0.8984212279319763, 0.772312581539154, 0.9795843362808228, 0.8078451752662659, 0.8318337798118591, 0.8291190266609192, 0.89882892370224, 0.9389781951904297, 0.9192085266113281, 0.6636059284210205, 0.90071040391922, 0.8808096051216125, 0.9007516503334045, 0.9292119741439819, 0.7160161137580872, 0.9058670401573181, 0.9058005213737488, 0.8899737000465393, 0.8932650089263916, 0.8477481007575989, 0.8611575365066528, 0.8737372756004333, 0.9481729865074158, 0.8796791434288025, 0.8946982026100159, 0.8797505497932434, 0.9189398288726807, 0.8984166383743286, 0.9116250872612, 0.8972107768058777, 0.9126019477844238, 0.9215494990348816, 0.9049379229545593, 0.9070946574211121, 0.8990209698677063, 0.5699418187141418, 0.8668049573898315, 0.8191904425621033, 0.8781837224960327, 0.8980352282524109, 0.8867371678352356, 0.7316166758537292, 0.8664914965629578, 0.9072977900505066, 0.7998337149620056, 0.688630223274231, 0.8084282279014587, 0.9021125435829163, 0.8815800547599792, 0.8052958250045776, 0.8809710741043091, 0.795827329158783, 0.8697522878646851, 0.8138880133628845, 0.9040756225585938, 0.8630493879318237, 0.950036346912384, 0.8556451201438904, 0.8753693699836731, 0.9346179366111755, 0.8538466691970825, 0.8911787271499634, 0.9457923769950867, 0.9339272379875183, 0.8823627829551697, 0.9047932624816895, 0.9011008143424988, 0.8888989686965942, 0.8932837247848511, 0.9255118370056152, 0.9751046299934387, 0.8944567441940308, 0.8879799842834473, 0.8415802121162415, 0.8552150726318359, 0.88508540391922, 0.8730745911598206, 0.8285437226295471, 0.9098350405693054, 0.9403689503669739, 0.5381225943565369, 0.36003729701042175, 0.9034426212310791, 0.776804506778717, 0.8503866195678711, 0.8290466070175171, 0.7781233787536621, 0.7233391404151917, 0.8938669562339783, 0.8940904140472412, 0.9197637438774109, 0.9092289209365845, 0.8100007176399231, 0.8997395634651184, 0.946294367313385, 0.913547694683075, 0.932327389717102, 0.9260295033454895, 0.9381773471832275, 0.7449081540107727, 0.8917924165725708, 0.9083012938499451, 0.888536810874939, 0.9213560819625854, 0.946627676486969, 0.8645496964454651, 0.8970291614532471, 0.8575313687324524, 0.9360200762748718, 0.9449222683906555, 0.8626864552497864, 0.859765887260437, 0.8976209759712219, 0.8238368630409241, 0.8389381766319275, 0.8917281031608582, 0.8244588375091553, 0.8755449652671814, 0.4839231073856354, 0.8912243843078613, 0.8926144242286682, 0.8833970427513123, 0.9401164650917053, 0.8888658285140991, 0.7969805002212524, 0.7256413102149963, 0.8984692692756653, 0.7769149541854858, 0.8780408501625061, 0.8094130158424377, 0.8427945971488953, 0.5317314267158508, 0.7828568816184998, 0.9426038265228271, 0.9067203402519226, 0.9152573943138123, 0.9127345681190491, 0.9333897233009338, 0.8630651831626892, 0.9178146719932556, 0.9137246012687683, 0.825307309627533, 0.8894304633140564, 0.8865833878517151, 0.9167226552963257, 0.8026919364929199, 0.7970860600471497, 0.8122608661651611, 0.9160750508308411, 0.65547776222229, 0.6428683996200562, 0.8620569109916687, 0.9310621619224548, 0.9090027213096619, 0.8881644606590271, 0.7352889180183411, 0.7579677700996399, 0.83769291639328, 0.773601233959198, 0.7987072467803955, 0.6760019063949585, 0.9281918406486511, 0.8713774085044861, 0.9412518739700317, 0.9119558334350586, 0.863722562789917, 0.9003366231918335, 0.915421187877655, 0.9205255508422852, 0.9401131272315979, 0.8781595826148987, 0.867617666721344, 0.9153581261634827, 0.5510083436965942, 0.8564675450325012, 0.7505556344985962, 0.8918208479881287, 0.8753539323806763, 0.6398757100105286, 0.6864469051361084, 0.8592373132705688, 0.8751116394996643, 0.9435768723487854, 0.8593160510063171, 0.9379259943962097, 0.893518328666687, 0.8577073812484741, 0.8745523691177368, 0.7750339508056641, 0.8193254470825195, 0.8119847774505615, 0.7456944584846497, 0.9220737218856812, 0.9151627421379089, 0.9121971726417542, 0.8982792496681213, 0.9474906325340271, 0.7445078492164612, 0.962104856967926, 0.8823879361152649, 0.8890568614006042, 0.8518689870834351, 0.9291229844093323, 0.6583291888237, 0.6202197670936584, 0.6647301316261292, 0.9024986028671265, 0.8668074011802673, 0.9031673669815063, 0.8307681083679199, 0.8256050944328308, 0.8694959282875061, 0.913990318775177, 0.9064040780067444, 0.9163863658905029, 0.8410253524780273, 0.9249158501625061, 0.8758618235588074, 0.9258399605751038, 0.9241880774497986, 0.8898582458496094, 0.7896499037742615, 0.820172131061554, 0.9087437391281128, 0.8619480729103088, 0.9157135486602783, 0.8710498213768005, 0.7723399996757507, 0.9109933376312256, 0.8498088717460632, 0.8961902260780334, 0.7371794581413269, 0.9079086780548096, 0.8028097152709961, 0.9057565927505493, 0.8855347037315369, 0.8986412882804871, 0.9526713490486145, 0.9097567796707153, 0.9044693112373352, 0.9042519927024841, 0.72613924741745, 0.9102504849433899, 0.8613981604576111, 0.8603439927101135, 0.8985493779182434, 0.9250864386558533, 0.8032020330429077, 0.872180700302124, 0.7462131977081299, 0.8319005966186523, 0.8542895913124084, 0.8545103073120117, 0.7992317080497742, 0.7792255282402039, 0.8183585405349731, 0.5784326791763306, 0.510680079460144, 0.9402509331703186, 0.9232792854309082, 0.8916490077972412, 0.8033972382545471, 0.8691716194152832, 0.9147934317588806, 0.9135382175445557, 0.8870809674263, 0.8378817439079285, 0.7803496718406677, 0.7481408715248108, 0.8461337685585022, 0.7942954897880554, 0.7597999572753906, 0.842414140701294, 0.8762536644935608, 0.891259491443634, 0.8905763030052185, 0.8964141011238098, 0.9290506839752197, 0.7595869302749634, 0.8665082454681396, 0.7855797410011292, 0.9568299651145935, 0.7292442321777344, 0.9354200959205627, 0.9059111475944519, 0.8003453016281128, 0.8422005772590637, 0.7966363430023193, 0.8366047143936157, 0.8864536285400391, 0.9134324193000793, 0.8506021499633789, 0.9246025681495667, 0.8650031089782715, 0.9234344363212585, 0.8415573239326477, 0.8655632734298706, 0.9263269305229187, 0.8613112568855286, 0.7566978335380554, 0.8202959895133972, 0.9078543782234192, 0.9116157293319702, 0.9243741631507874, 0.9363307952880859, 0.8770298957824707, 0.8382002115249634, 0.8674144744873047, 0.8412888646125793, 0.8937777876853943, 0.7405481934547424, 0.8986424207687378, 0.933861494064331, 0.9378705620765686, 0.8857508301734924, 0.8734830617904663, 0.8505878448486328, 0.8727661967277527, 0.8658713102340698, 0.841313898563385, 0.8434789180755615, 0.8632198572158813, 0.9030428528785706, 0.837716281414032, 0.8978185653686523, 0.9178434610366821, 0.9678491950035095, 0.9119380712509155, 0.843376874923706, 0.8926813006401062, 0.9299393892288208, 0.9078935980796814, 0.9292994141578674, 0.7834697365760803, 0.8912469744682312, 0.8665889501571655, 0.9033392071723938, 0.8714680075645447, 0.8573758006095886, 0.8587192893028259, 0.7858272194862366, 0.9125253558158875, 0.8214724659919739, 0.865437388420105, 0.9351255297660828, 0.7313889265060425, 0.8544967174530029, 0.8982598781585693, 0.8724163174629211, 0.8718738555908203, 0.8939759135246277, 0.601605236530304, 0.8299907445907593, 0.5644832253456116, 0.769540548324585, 0.5651035308837891, 0.910009503364563, 0.8460061550140381, 0.7340816259384155, 0.8248189687728882, 0.8742703795433044, 0.8648642897605896, 0.9205504059791565, 0.9150782823562622, 0.6280338168144226, 0.7589961886405945, 0.8432151675224304, 0.8391249775886536, 0.9312626123428345, 0.8993866443634033, 0.8771779537200928, 0.7351787686347961, 0.8780557513237, 0.867495596408844, 0.8664891719818115, 0.8624772429466248, 0.9145211577415466, 0.8990615010261536, 0.7824795842170715, 0.8757819533348083, 0.7475735545158386, 0.8795607686042786, 0.9291396737098694, 0.9443784952163696, 0.8887796998023987, 0.9174475073814392, 0.8912892937660217, 0.7966445684432983, 0.7817476391792297, 0.792369544506073, 0.7578607797622681, 0.8542290329933167, 0.8936273455619812, 0.878118097782135, 0.8173647522926331, 0.7962822318077087, 0.9047693610191345, 0.8825003504753113, 0.8397348523139954, 0.951216459274292, 0.835077702999115, 0.897962749004364, 0.860487163066864, 0.8689448237419128, 0.8434894680976868, 0.8723629117012024, 0.8860811591148376, 0.8363549709320068, 0.8772438764572144, 0.8648011088371277, 0.9085519909858704, 0.8221732974052429, 0.8342927098274231, 0.8514053225517273, 0.8859312534332275, 0.9014785289764404, 0.8632869720458984, 0.7115659117698669, 0.8746880292892456, 0.7998522520065308, 0.8028516173362732, 0.8853518962860107, 0.906770646572113, 0.9168476462364197, 0.8885053992271423, 0.9298958778381348, 0.88568514585495, 0.5570528507232666, 0.8833452463150024, 0.9252816438674927, 0.658355176448822, 0.8782008290290833, 0.8571545481681824, 0.91268390417099, 0.8223407864570618, 0.9236140251159668, 0.895340621471405, 0.8448423743247986, 0.8994914889335632, 0.7711169123649597, 0.7369394898414612, 0.8212726712226868, 0.8570992350578308, 0.823790431022644, 0.910796046257019, 0.8839853405952454, 0.526347279548645, 0.8532547950744629, 0.8677359223365784, 0.879628598690033, 0.8368870615959167, 0.8802372217178345, 0.8715205788612366, 0.851472795009613, 0.9108455181121826, 0.8968963623046875, 0.8057483434677124, 0.8173056244850159, 0.9327633380889893, 0.8230043649673462, 0.8289778828620911, 0.9113281965255737, 0.9057486653327942, 0.9104235172271729, 0.8595513105392456, 0.9397266507148743, 0.8956272602081299, 0.9093605875968933, 0.7724021077156067, 0.8743788003921509, 0.9421132206916809, 0.9201229214668274, 0.9251868724822998, 0.9023590087890625, 0.9047884345054626, 0.8894039988517761, 0.7949473261833191, 0.9252113699913025, 0.933451235294342, 0.8749962449073792, 0.9292445778846741, 0.8060534000396729, 0.8461790680885315, 0.9161379933357239, 0.8958356976509094, 0.8735982775688171, 0.8243260979652405, 0.9034846425056458, 0.9194644093513489, 0.9434107542037964, 0.83938068151474, 0.8738799095153809, 0.8146575093269348, 0.8142186999320984, 0.835697591304779, 0.9095286130905151, 0.8997883796691895, 0.9001027941703796, 0.9187689423561096, 0.9182513356208801, 0.9194220900535583, 0.9336146712303162, 0.9077684283256531, 0.8584729433059692, 0.8695110082626343, 0.8904734253883362, 0.8699858784675598, 0.8940922617912292, 0.8527962565422058, 0.8612490296363831, 0.934113085269928, 0.9148769974708557, 0.7021899819374084, 0.7278164625167847, 0.8878481388092041, 0.8974307179450989, 0.9474366307258606, 0.9461054801940918, 0.978887140750885, 0.9090221524238586, 0.9133732914924622, 0.7738916277885437, 0.8355759978294373, 0.9530382752418518, 0.9146629571914673, 0.9304248094558716, 0.8555031418800354, 0.8810226321220398, 0.763825535774231, 0.86775141954422, 0.8509429097175598, 0.8808340430259705, 0.8585193753242493, 0.825035035610199, 0.9151231646537781, 0.5445513725280762, 0.8880290389060974, 0.861068069934845, 0.8772670030593872, 0.9250115752220154, 0.8953178524971008, 0.90257728099823, 0.7010493278503418, 0.9082271456718445, 0.8446102142333984, 0.9048035740852356, 0.9318981766700745, 0.9130523800849915, 0.9617405533790588, 0.8911637663841248, 0.7486963868141174, 0.8211896419525146, 0.8450189232826233, 0.9284723997116089, 0.8597460389137268, 0.9316853880882263, 0.8979058265686035, 0.8927514553070068, 0.9434510469436646, 0.8991039395332336, 0.86057049036026, 0.9352051615715027, 0.9019083380699158, 0.9069622159004211, 0.8673287630081177, 0.9395914673805237, 0.879998505115509, 0.8282665610313416, 0.8639798760414124, 0.9181743264198303, 0.7905402779579163, 0.7027598023414612, 0.89531010389328, 0.809093177318573, 0.9452206492424011, 0.7303474545478821, 0.92840176820755, 0.8895041942596436, 0.8570024967193604, 0.9400269389152527, 0.8968712687492371, 0.9237794280052185, 0.863552987575531, 0.9146419167518616, 0.8641828894615173, 0.9246674180030823, 0.9284691214561462, 0.8783565163612366, 0.6475818753242493, 0.7137717604637146, 0.7483864426612854, 0.9229062795639038, 0.9549022316932678, 0.9014767408370972, 0.9359117150306702, 0.829508364200592, 0.9091355204582214, 0.883060872554779, 0.9027070999145508, 0.8867655396461487, 0.8847518563270569, 0.9046070575714111, 0.898766815662384, 0.8896713256835938, 0.915632426738739, 0.8998757004737854, 0.8634594082832336, 0.8966664671897888, 0.8502963185310364, 0.9018385410308838, 0.8965961337089539, 0.8300629258155823, 0.7973665595054626, 0.8732248544692993, 0.795291006565094, 0.8576253056526184, 0.8637331128120422, 0.8804276585578918, 0.8879604935646057, 0.8801972270011902, 0.8636637330055237, 0.5669865012168884, 0.9133009314537048, 0.9102656245231628, 0.8903966546058655, 0.8592128157615662, 0.8878485560417175, 0.8935754895210266, 0.8902002573013306, 0.7677431702613831, 0.9286525249481201, 0.8489267230033875, 0.8502718806266785, 0.9327003955841064, 0.9348583817481995, 0.908656895160675, 0.8902915120124817, 0.8690128922462463, 0.8241587281227112, 0.9166578650474548, 0.8253311514854431, 0.8816362023353577, 0.8738035559654236, 0.9207654595375061, 0.9431067109107971, 0.944629967212677, 0.9167171716690063, 0.9193372130393982, 0.8795428276062012, 0.6295784711837769, 0.7661453485488892, 0.9145390391349792, 0.8689393401145935, 0.9683462381362915, 0.8700440526008606, 0.9047263264656067, 0.8917939066886902, 0.8812912106513977, 0.9102087616920471, 0.9075626730918884, 0.8643271327018738, 0.8707790970802307, 0.8693242073059082, 0.8338413238525391, 0.8716847896575928, 0.6494841575622559, 0.9305830597877502, 0.7857399582862854, 0.900154709815979, 0.6861820816993713, 0.9396834969520569, 0.9113081693649292, 0.8735787272453308, 0.8863428831100464, 0.915289044380188, 0.8608773350715637, 0.9057206511497498, 0.8895613551139832, 0.9195162653923035, 0.858809769153595, 0.9687204360961914, 0.8090922236442566, 0.8775866031646729, 0.6687696576118469, 0.8851071000099182, 0.870576024055481, 0.8779107928276062, 0.8107700943946838, 0.8661730885505676, 0.9184834361076355, 0.9208915829658508, 0.9528184533119202, 0.6733543276786804, 0.9003824591636658, 0.8905735611915588, 0.8208337426185608, 0.9237868189811707, 0.9324815273284912, 0.9138429164886475, 0.8430910706520081, 0.8648595809936523, 0.8304969668388367, 0.8556531071662903, 0.8486061692237854, 0.8850017189979553, 0.8847343325614929, 0.9187772870063782, 0.9253658056259155, 0.9104457497596741, 0.8752050995826721, 0.9031291604042053, 0.9028595089912415, 0.7996767163276672, 0.9065645337104797, 0.6936742663383484, 0.8986133933067322, 0.8066820502281189, 0.6940974593162537, 0.8060390949249268, 0.8526495099067688, 0.9464151263237, 0.9146274328231812, 0.7242905497550964, 0.8995718359947205, 0.9040910601615906, 0.537300705909729, 0.8462616801261902, 0.9010670781135559, 0.7268218398094177, 0.9134359955787659, 0.8026075959205627, 0.8603751063346863, 0.8557584881782532, 0.8463699221611023, 0.813200056552887, 0.9274355173110962, 0.9197776913642883, 0.8527352213859558, 0.7826520800590515, 0.8633080124855042, 0.8225812315940857, 0.8769453167915344, 0.7743193507194519, 0.9319390654563904, 0.8475799560546875, 0.8949894309043884, 0.9079360365867615, 0.911072313785553, 0.9056552648544312, 0.7768487334251404, 0.8982481956481934, 0.8417609930038452, 0.9019584059715271, 0.8265833854675293, 0.9055389165878296, 0.8659602999687195, 0.8593282699584961, 0.8749587535858154, 0.8980993032455444, 0.9096471667289734, 0.9493528008460999, 0.8732472062110901, 0.9058236479759216, 0.8446456789970398, 0.922344982624054, 0.9168090224266052, 0.8919253945350647, 0.8848357796669006, 0.7043450474739075, 0.8568618297576904, 0.9002040028572083, 0.9069978594779968, 0.7917925715446472, 0.8642190098762512, 0.8999506235122681, 0.8287236094474792, 0.8017446398735046, 0.7494891285896301, 0.7933600544929504, 0.8595933318138123, 0.9065207839012146, 0.8065356612205505, 0.9287657141685486, 0.8652741312980652, 0.8649724721908569, 0.899560272693634, 0.8450853228569031, 0.891198456287384, 0.9242330193519592, 0.87491774559021, 0.8878840208053589, 0.8606069684028625, 0.8937392830848694, 0.9396761059761047, 0.9014139771461487, 0.8907002806663513, 0.9152668118476868, 0.8576793670654297, 0.8663381934165955, 0.8768224120140076, 0.8652541041374207, 0.8849512934684753, 0.8677899241447449, 0.8870525360107422, 0.8823294043540955, 0.8115531206130981, 0.8276062607765198, 0.8830942511558533, 0.7830526232719421, 0.8830769658088684, 0.8923879265785217, 0.7739515900611877, 0.8600855469703674, 0.8613449335098267, 0.8866154551506042, 0.9036174416542053, 0.7093160152435303, 0.8666289448738098, 0.8158205151557922, 0.8955196142196655, 0.8962739109992981, 0.9200788140296936, 0.9212937951087952, 0.924358069896698, 0.879475474357605, 0.948378324508667, 0.9321222305297852, 0.9048414826393127, 0.8753119707107544, 0.9109063744544983, 0.8582785725593567, 0.8878107070922852, 0.8616372346878052, 0.866580069065094, 0.8561343550682068, 0.8853958249092102, 0.8808307647705078, 0.7667011618614197, 0.8885427713394165, 0.8920984864234924, 0.8566257357597351, 0.9336215853691101, 0.87754225730896, 0.927300751209259, 0.705270528793335, 0.8512786030769348, 0.9142752289772034, 0.8954424262046814, 0.9400550127029419, 0.7993014454841614, 0.8924750685691833, 0.7038731575012207, 0.8513696193695068, 0.7664931416511536, 0.8884097337722778, 0.8986421227455139, 0.7840307354927063, 0.970180094242096, 0.8266253471374512, 0.9051032662391663, 0.8998426198959351, 0.46560245752334595, 0.9407150149345398, 0.8749209046363831, 0.8082451224327087, 0.8549887537956238, 0.7484452128410339, 0.5846179127693176, 0.9420667290687561, 0.9175886511802673, 0.9098617434501648, 0.8526054620742798, 0.8739151358604431, 0.7354257702827454, 0.8633358478546143, 0.822966456413269, 0.932153582572937, 0.9155557155609131, 0.905047595500946, 0.8641818761825562, 0.8971148133277893, 0.9321500658988953, 0.9064346551895142, 0.8470251560211182, 0.9215494990348816, 0.8475955128669739, 0.8774735331535339, 0.8372421860694885, 0.9148668646812439, 0.9365513920783997, 0.8424385190010071, 0.8996483683586121, 0.9533172249794006, 0.9192913174629211, 0.883545994758606, 0.8732107281684875]}